This article has been “Decently Ironed”. Any article that is sarcastic, funny, or important about the world of blogging, the awards given thereof, or anything elevated to a level of superior-blogger status as fodder for comedy or commentary is eligible for a “Decently Ironed” award. If you receive this award, you will be blessed with the honor of having to do NOTHING. You only have to display the icon in your sidebar with a link back to me, which in the end will only benefit me. (It’s only fair, I badly photoshopped the thing.)
Take a look around next time you're out driving. How many full-service stations are there anymore? Not many. Most gas stations are self-service now.
In place of chicken, I used dried shitake mushrooms. They take a while to soften so if they only sit for a couple of hours in the soup, they'll still be a little chewy (which I was okay with because it reminded me of posole's cousin 'menudo', but for reasons I won't get into). By the second day they were much softer and oh so good. The broth was hearty and spicy and everything was perfectly balanced.
2007: Royal Mail Scottish Children’s Book Awards, 0-7 category (shortlisted)
I have never been inspired to write anything regarding politics but
Why do wet ducks bark at night?
That’s how you know you belong here.
With the newest, fanciest gadgets & everything being totally accessible on the move – internet/3g is no longer a luxury, but in fact a necessity. Although I do call it a necessity, it at the same time is loads of fun.
The wine however caused the need for a mid-day coffee run...to where else? Starbucks! LOL! You know I can't stay away! The funniest part is that the coffee was about the same price there in Euros as it is here in US$...meaning my $5 coffee was more like my $7 coffee....OOPS!
8/7 – Blow off tube still full this morning, bucket is filling up with yeast. Temp is holding at 75˚
21. The Universe Is A Haunted House (drip drop)
It started as–what seemed to me–practical problem-solving: I wanted us to have fresh bread on Christmas day. But there weren’t going to be any shops open that day. So…I thougt I could make some of my own.
But, I also have lots of amazing recycled and upcycled grown up clothes for you to wear and proudly say, "My friend Amber made this for me!".
A: I’ve thought about it.
When we showed up, the boys were already on stage and getting ready to perform their little jingle for the cameras. After one shoot, they went downstairs and to the back, presumably to do some interviews or review what they had just shot. The second time around, we were able to go behind into their tent and see the boys upclose as they had Morgane, another Soompi Team member, ask the boys a couple random questions for an SBS interview segment.
KathyJo
Just to make this really really clear for you: reading manuscripts and choosing manuscripts to represent is what I do all day, every day. It costs a writer thirty nine cents to send me a letter and thirty nine cents to receive a reply. We don't call offers of representation "awards". We think of more like..yanno...a business.
Heat the oven to 350°. Season inside the cavity of the chicken with salt and pepper. Carefully slide your fingers between the skin and the breast meat; Place 2 bay leaves and a pat of butter between the skin and the breast meat. Place the chicken in a cast iron skillet. Season all over with salt and pepper. Place the chicken in the oven with the cavity facing the rear of the oven. Roast until the juices run clear when pierced in the thigh with a knife, about 1 hour. Let rest for 15 minutes. Carve and serve immediately.
I confess, though. When the sky inevitably clouded over, I swapped these for some of my ultragirl shoes. I didn't especially want wet toes!
7) Take Back Jobs Given to Foreigners
to express something- “She had a disappointed look on her face when she saw the room.”;
The herb was said to regulate contractions so that the baby was delivered safely, easily, and quickly. After the baby was born, the Native American mother who nursed her child would put a squawvine solution on her nipples to relieve the soreness.
The much-quoted Gallop poll on gay rights noted that the Catholic Church opposes same-sex marriage and “less than half of Protestants approve.” According to the poll, among those who attend religious services weekly fully 67 percent oppose it while among those who say they attend monthly 53 percent oppose it.
Even if it was theoretically possible to reach an individual or collective narcissist, it would take time. And time is precisely what the planet has run out of. Admitting that might be the exact moment that we step out of the cloying childishness and optimistic white–lite denial of so much of the left, and into our adult knowledge. And with all apologies to Yeats, in knowledge begins responsibilities. It’s to you grown–ups, the grieving and the raging, that we address this book.
MDNA
Mix salt and milk in a heavy bottom sauce pan and bring to just below a boil. I think about 180 is perfect as any hotter and you risk scorching the milk. And having been a barista I know just how nasty scorch milk tastes and smells.
Which I finally liked! After I repainted over my other two experiment drawers with the blue again, I applied this white wash to all of the drawers and the entire dresser. I actually had to have Chris do the white wash to the bottom shelf because I couldn't handle squatting or lying down with my new large and in charge body I'm carrying around these days. I tried to just roll with whatever outcome happened...worst case, we can go back and refinish this dresser later!
And the bed is lost to the fly on the wall
I also asked Magnum how his dad was doing in my thank you text but never heard back. He hasn’t been on facebook. His sister made her profile picture one of their family. I wish I knew if it was okay to text him more or if I just need to leave him alone. I have no idea what to do.
3. Four Letters
We’ll be voting 9:30PM sharp for ACF Exec next year. Please continue to pray.
That means the owner of an average home, valued at $146,700, would pay an additional $53.55 in property taxes next year.
The next morning, we headed out to see the city. And by this, I mean we walked the city. After reaching the Han River, we crossed the bridge, allowing Ahna to stretch her legs a bit in the large grassy park on the other side. Large grassy lots gave way to well landscaped sidewalks, statues, sculptures, and bridal couples before we arrived at the large bridge that would lead us over the Yangtze. An elevator ride to the top of the bridge, after a nominal fee, left us walking along a narrow pedestrian lane with the Yangtze flowing below us. Upon crossing into the southern portion of the city, we leisurely made our way to the Yellow Crane Tower, taking in some local flare along the way. Dinner time brought us full circle, quite literally, and back to a ‘loosely termed’ pedestrian street and a food street that could not be missed.
The Aromatic Cleansing Balm smells amazing and, according to my son, looks like caramel. It turns into a milky emulsion when mixed with water, and leaves my skin feeling completely clean without any tightness.
including a select group of letterpress invitations,
Bake the cookies for 13-16 minutes, rotating the baking sheets midway through baking until they are a light golden brown and the edges barely start to darken then remove them from the oven while they are still warm and press each depression a bit more to reinforce the wells and let them cool completely.
Toward the throne to witness there 30
So many of you have been so good to me. I have definitely learned who truly loves me through this. I am so thankful to so many of you who have gone out of your way to support me and my family, even if we weren't close before. Character is truly shown when life gets hard. I'm thankful to be able to see that in so many people.
I see bits and pieces of broken glasses,
If you want the thing you love, you must have a pizzioli baby
'We are Bradford' is also mentioned. Someone has pointed out that its main number is a London number. So much for 'EDL outsiders'.
What was the purpose of this life? Why were we here? What was the meaning of love? I pondered these and other questions looking for answers but not finding any.
I have about 24 hemp prefolds and 6 Flip organics that are used for my 2 youngest, plus 6 covers each. My 4-year-old has 2 of the Flip training pants shells and 10 pads. I think we have maybe 20 wipes.
"Hi, Mrs. D, what's up?" he said warily.
What is final is the 4.2-inch screen size and the 1280×768 resolution. That’s higher than the 960×640 of the iPhone 4S (and makes fonts in the version of the PlayBook OS running on it look tiny).
1 mystery
- the smiths - the queen is dead - rough trade records - 1986 (lp reissue)
TALK IS CHEAP WHEN LIVES ARE IN JEOPARDY
Me: "It went great!"
Most of the plastic seats were empty but the 30 or so people at the meeting in Irituia were paying a lot of attention to discussions about environmentally sound agriculture in their biodiverse part of the world.
9. Double Vision -- Foreigner
The years have passed by, and two of our kiddos have flown the nest, with a third in college and the youngest a sophomore in high school next month.
But some downward pressure on lumber prices, in addition to the possible tariff reductions, could come from Russia’s entry into the World Trade Organization. Membership is expected to increase competitiveness through reduced tariffs on Russian lumber exports, increasing exports to China and European markets. Theoretically, this would ease price pressures in the US market, but procedural issues of implementation could delay this effect.
06 - Down From The Mountain 04:32
Ernane Rabelo, Universidade Federal de Viçosa. Information Behavior and News Evocation: The Case of Mass Communication Students
The next step is to develop a compliance plan that is tailored to your company’s specific export needs. A compliance plan should address, at a minimum, the following:
The hijackers wore Western-style clothing. Weeks before the attacks some of the hijackers partied by drinking alcohol, which is against the religion of Islam; some of them bought prostitutes and slept with them, which is also against the religion of Islam. Some of them even purchased and sniffed cocaine.
1) Write a Post about the event. Feel free to use the information provided in this post.
So I won't.
The deceased … was married to Miss Mary Bloom; they had fifteen children, eleven still live to mourn the loss of a very kind and affectionate father; the widow mourns for her kind and beloved companion. He died of a fever, about the 9th day during his sickness we had the privilege of conversing with him on the subject of religion; he was deeply engaged for the salvation of his precious soul; we prayed with him, and when we had left the room he remarked to his wife, that he felt as much refreshed as if he had taken a cooling drink of water.
to newness and rebirth, but a hesitancy and a denial almost
all you have to do is go to the Unity Website.. go to the Ippity Chick of your choosing.. and purchase.. Ippity is a wonderful line that Unity has come up with to support families.. so by clicking on the Chick of your choice you will be supporting a family as well..
3. Danny Boy - The Chieftains w/ Diana Krall
Now we reduce these to binary
This is generally a serious(ish) blog offering sound(ish) advice on writing. But I think Sundays should be a day off from serious(ish) professional stuff and so from now on Sunday posts will be more personal reflections on frivolous things. I might even try to make some tenuous link with writing, but I'm sure I won't always succeed.
To my way of thinking the world IS “too much with us” and I have to fight that every day. I don’t want to “lay waste my Powers” and I need to constantly remind myself that all the “getting and spending” can’t give me more than what the world has to offer for free … not the least being this wonderful poem from William Wordsworth. I will heed his words and try to live by them.
I suppose that I’ve had quite a few ‘too lascivious to talk about’ adventures. Sometimes, when I think of them I cringe. Most of them occurred in Las Vegas. Sometimes it amazes me that I survived some of them. Especially the ones involving firearms and on one occasion, serial killer Andrew Cunanan.
Shortbus
I nod me head and stop singing. I'll do anything you say officer, because no one is taking me music.
Virginia executioners who inject condemned inmates with lethal doses of drugs are illegally practicing medicine, pharmacy and anesthesiology without licenses, two Alexandria lawyers claim in a complaint filed Tuesday.
Enjoy this addition of pleasant ideas to your Monday! (Free of charge, too.)
Just goes to show you that not all of society is filled with hate even those in the bible belt.
In the teaching sector part of my life, the words I heard were foolish and obtuse, in addition to to the above. I do not miss a single conversation from that part of my work life. (Well maybe interactions with a few original thinking, genuine, enthusiastic students.. which is more than can be said for the coroprate sector.)
Haswell is expected to have Advanced Vector Extensions 2 (AVX2), DX11.1, OpenGL 3.2, Thunderbolt, Transactional Synchronization Extensions (TSX) and Windows 8 support.
Once you have your planning finished, it is time for having a good time, as you start digging in the dirt. As you would expect, gardening is an extremely dirty hobby. Before you do any kind of sowing, you will have to get rid of all the debris, rocks, grass and weeds. Once that is completed, dig up about a foot deep of ground, make it level then add a bit of minerals or compost if necessary. As appropriate, start adding some lime if you realize the soil is acidic and add some peat moss if you feel the soil is too sandy. Introducing plenty of fertilizer is going to help your plants grow well neutral to acidic soil. Comply with every one of the directions, when you buy seeds to plant. If you intend to have growing plants instead, guarantee that the roots, leaves and stems look healthy.
Have a great week.
While Nathan went to Priesthood, Marley and I went to fill up the gas tank and search out a grocery store so we could buy some lunch stuff for after church on Sunday. We got some pre-made hoagie sandwhiches from the deli with condiments on the side (little packets), avocados, chips and drinks. We already had oranges and bananas.
1.Christ is the Eternal High priest whom offered Himself on the Cross for many.
My own quick response is part of what made me decide the questions are STUPID. They’re cryptic and absurd. The options are narrow. Han Solo wasn’t even listed as a favorite character in Star Wars. Ridiculous.
Gone for the winds and the droughts and the tears.
John Frances Daley gets major points here, too. I like him quite a bit in “Bones”—and I think that show does a better job of using him as the “kid” in a grown-up’s workspace—but, like Brendan with Xander, he’s good at this character. As Jimmy, the n00b chef from Mormon country, he’s worshipful of Jack and a bit of a moral compass-cum-punching bag for the rest, all while maintaining his good cheer. And I think he ends up with the one functional romantic relationship on the show, too. His cluelessness in many cases is overdone—but “Kitchen Confidential” is charming enough on the whole that it’s fun to watch, not painful.
Keep that word “called” in mind as we turn to Ephesians 4:1. “I therefore, the prisoner of the Lord, beseech you that ye walk worthy of the vocation wherewith ye are called.” To walk worthy one must accept the will, the leading of the Lord in one’s life. Don’t question Him. Don’t change it. Just do it.
XVCYL Blog (xvcylblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
The causes of this sickness are many and complex. But three things can be said with certainty: every one of them is the fault of the liberal intelligentsia; every one of them was instituted or exacerbated by the Labour government; and at the very heart of these problems lies the breakdown of the family.
But America is a unique creature, built on the power of the individual. The nature of its character is not the collective, but that enduring independent spirit.
“As a Christian minister, I believe that marriage is under threat from many angles, but also believe that recognizing same-sex unions will help return marriage to its rightful place in society.”
I know I'm doing the right thing. I know Joaquin will learn best from his typical peers and he will learn best to TALK from his typical talkative peers. But it's still hard and it hits you.
To be honest I wasn’t that grateful. The bit about the “cult classic” sounded patronising and if she’d really wanted to publish the book, I couldn’t exactly see what was stopping her.
Racked: 07-13-2007
So imagine my utter delight when, last week, I learned that a show about bebeh sloths was going to debut on Animal Planet. That's right: Bebeh freakin' sloths.
The creatures all tremble in their dens.
Pours a nice, fairly opaque amber with a very nice head--although I poured it fast, so we'll see if there's any taste left once the head is gone. Blue Moon Brewing Company's Full Moon Winter. Pretty nice smell to it. Fairly malty and slightly peppery, like a winter (warmer?) ale should be.
»Scene 4 – iCarly studio«
The editorial in Inspire's March 2011 issue, signed by one Yahya Ibrahim, analyzes recent turmoil in the Middle East, and consequences for Al Qaeda, Israel and the West.
3.) A transpersonal God, again, offers nothing in the way of our individual lives. Why would a transpersonal God (extending beyond the personal; existence in a mystical, mental state etc) at all be concerned with any of us? In such a belief system we have no true, separate, individual identity. This is why in religions like traditional Buddhism there’s an elimination of even the idea of the “self.”
Within minutes, they located it.
Do you know Paris Pastry? Or French Madame? With those names, you might think I’ve got a couple other blogs on the side. Or if you know these fabulously inspiring sites, you know Danielle, a lovely woman in the Netherlands who’s just as obsessed with baking and sweets; fashion and design and “all things French” as I am. It made perfect sense to have her wrap up this Blog Tour.
but i wanna suck her up, bathe my tired eyes
I took a lukewarm bath. It was just after midnight. I sat in front of my vanity dresser and surveyed myself in the mirror for the umpteenth time. The spark within my blue irises were dulled, hazed, and literally invisible of any life left. My face was pale. And the crows feet around the outer of my lids seemed to stand out more and more each dreadful passing day. I surveyed my nails and noticed they were screaming manicure! The last time I had a manicure was on Valentine’s Day. Julian and I double-dated with Comi and Dallas that night. We attended a black-tie ball, and it was the last time either of us truly dressed up. I’m exactly like Julian, only I don’t sleep in late or avoid the sun like the plague because I have to drive our kids to school. My wardrobe consists of snug hugging tees, skinny jeans and tennis shoes. My hair is in a constant pony tail. And I refuse to wear make-up and jewelry.
I am blathering a bit this morning I apologise........
While smiling, seeing something inside,
A familiar farting sound attracts Tripeo's attention and he spots
So we simply picked a shorter hike with a different focus instead.
The The This is the day UK
it feels like they have known each other forever...
In this way and others, Safa is empowering the women of Jaffa to support one another, finance their own education, and make progress in their homes as well as in their communities.
* I began to wonder if I had DID, which was still called MPD at the time.
Just a little flaw happened with these 2 beautiful orange pumpkins that .... khm.. they were not sweet at all... :))) but I ate them... On Saturday I will buy again in order to have them for the long weekend....
Geez, y’all ask some tough questions. I’m terrible at choosing between two things that I love. This came up on the facebook page a while back and I went with Wolverine then.
As Exhumed Films has proved before, sometimes movies are obscure for a reason, but every once in a while the anonymity of a particular piece of celluloid can be a huge injustice. At the first (of hopefully many) eX-Fest, we were treated to some hidden gems and subjected to some that should probably never be seen by anyone (except for people as kooky as I am). Saturday saw the screening of twelve hours worth of some of the most obscure and batshit movies ever filmed. It was a great day of some truly whacky films, screened in the environment they were meant to be seen in.
It's kind of like adding another child to the family. -- Just one with special needs. :)
-Add in the powdered cardamom and saffron threads.(Gives a nice color and flavor)
10) Learn how to pamper myself — again.
But even though Dad was small, he was smart.
Day 1 Operation: Become a Gym Nut = Success
The lucky winner this month is...........
Getting rid of rats is difficult. Capturing or poisoning a few rats in the neighborhood makes little impact. To defeat them, a community has to cooperate in capturing or killing them, at the same time starving them, denying them shelter, and cutting off their sources of water. Denied a source of food, rats will turn to killing and eating each other, which further reduces the infestation.
Please if you can donate as little as £1 via text, then text the words DEBS68 £1 to the number 70070, Donations via text can be between £1 and £10.
2008
Apocalypse Now (dir. by Francis Ford Coppola, 1979)
I might take it slow at first, but I'm really looking forward to sharing my blog and reading yours again.
Now I am NOT saying that my staging efforts really had anything to do with the quick sale, but on the other hand......I guess it didn't hurt either! lol! Maybe I should start a new career! "Staging for a Speedy Sale!" :)
Hey, it works. Bastianich’s partnership with Batali has produced a series of restaurants that have become NYC institutions. But there were bumps along the way.
But if we fear God, he motivates us, and the effect of his motivation will be that we obey him more. As a result we take our sin more seriously, loving the cross more and wanting to sin less.
heaven is awaiting for you to dance this way
the objects around your house, the person sitting across from you.
We are taking orders until 5:00pm Dec. 21st,
It is a spirit that bows reverently before God, and then holds its divinest gifts as not too good nor too fine to be used in Christ‘s name in the service of the lowliest of God’s creatures.
~This Life that I speak of so much…
The advocate’s however are anxious about this win inside their approach to limit short term higher interest lending techniques. What they have to don’t get is even though they may possibly limit the ability of cash advance institutions to give generous degrees of online payday Loans, it won’t limit the need for these companies. The chances are greater that the desperate should seem elsewhere with regard to their rapid hard cash requires. This you could end up a lot more people getting on-line lending products which send out cash out of doors their local community or pressure them to carry out getting the cash by far more low light suggests, for example the underground community.
The train station is slightly out from the centre of town, but there are some great buildings to crane your neck at on the way in. The Museum & Art Gallery was surrounded by scaffolding and not exactly at its most picturesque, but the Adam Smith Theatre was certainly impressive enough and attracts a lot of prestigious touring groups (I remember seeing the RSC here quite a few years ago).
The Who - Sell Out - 1967
Please Report to the Nickname Office
unwittingly waving
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Place a layer of tortilla chips on the pan. In a bowl mix together then cubed chicken, black beans, and rotel tomatoes. Top the chips with this mixture. Then sprinkle this with cheddar cheese. Place pan in oven for about 10 minutes or until cheese melts. Remove from oven and enjoy!
Children return home
Time to plate.
Today you trembled at the roadside
Workbox/File 1:Geography Map (Pledges and Geography with MOM), 15 minutes
The “right to breathe clean air” is not included in the US Constitution as a personal right nor is breathing clean air even possible or logical to assume. Like the declaratory statement “No Safe level”, the claim of a “right to breathe clean air” is flatly absurd.
5 Boogie No More 6:09
voluntary contributions to their
This sounds like saying not to fly Old Glory in Tennessee in case it offends Southerners
* Your wear your tree-stand harness to hang up the Christmas lights or clean out the gutters.
Gel Stick- Place Gel Stick directly onto the stain, pressing down to dispense the concentrated gel. Rub into fabric and allow to stand 5-10 minutes before washing in the warmest water allowed for the fabric. For BEST results, treat stains immediately. (or, if you're like me...you can wait about a week and still get good results from those nasty, set-in-stains!)
you'll be touched by the story of this mama.
One would like to think that old pros like McCain and Pataki would try to carve out a niche as responsible centrists who could unite the increasingly-radicalized conservative base with the center electorate. If not them, then who? But alarmingly enough (they know things I don't), the Republican national leadership appears to be making the exact opposite calculation.
Note: Please RSVP as soon as possible to jeff.young@blackstar.coop. You can also email me with any questions. Hope to see you there!
-Lots and lots of house cleaning
One evening after having many drinks, we went down to the river where I burst into tears.
Personal life
9/16 Seattle, WA @ El Corazon
silken shroud encompasses those cold limbs.
It was a fight to the death.
Tomorrow kicks off our HOGtoberfest celebration, with store-wide savings of at least 30% off regular-priced items. However, YOU can start shopping our digi store early: use code "HOGTOBERFEST" today thru Wed., Oct. 26 to receive 30% off your digi purchases. (Tell your friends!) Then check out our Sale page tomorrow for all the sale rules and details. (You can start making your wish-lists in the meantime!) And if you're on our newsletter list, check your inbox later today. :)
Whew. I think I'm going to put away the Bundt pans for a bit and make some brownies now. :)
Bit by bit, Monsieur Leon’s whistling warms up and changes colour,
Well, because hey, I’m ahead of where I need to be. Bad, because it’s given me the chance to slack off and nurse this cold that’s been hounding me all week. I needed the sleep and to be left undisturbed for a while. But I DID want to spend today writing. I’d expected to get at least two posts in (though that was the optimistic “If I don’t waste today”). Instead it looks like I’ll be lucky to get one. I need to go fetch some dinner and then afterwards I can see about getting some writing done. But I’ll have to be satisfied with one post instead of two.
The emerging patterns of the salvage economy that have been discussed here over the last few weeks feed into this same quest for resilience. Many older technologies, of the sort that might readily be salvaged and put to use, are a good deal less efficient than their modern replacements, and therefore much more resilient.
Made with real fruit and without dairy, this is a nearly fat-free treat that you can add to smoothies or just enjoy outside on a hot summer day.
For God hath not given us the spirit of fear; but of power, and of love, and of a sound mind.
I am still reeling from the damage.
I lightly feathered the BG10 out as simple sky accent from his shirt. If my reds had bled at all, then this would have caused the red ink to spread all over the place as well. But you can see from the back of the paper that my ink does not soak all the way to the lines, unlike the first image. By using less ink overall, I am able to get my reds to work better.
9. Draw (and correctly, fully label) the three story structures Harrower talks about in Chapter 3.
Al mentioned he was taking Lucien swimming in the morning before dropping him at Kids Club. Bad Dad asked if he could send his son down to the pool, too, so he and his wife could enjoy a peaceful breakfast together. Alex said "Err, sure... he knows how to swim, right?" and Bad Dad was like, "Nah, but we'll put those water wing things on him."
Sophisticated Finishes: Rust Antiquing Solution, Iron Metallic Surfacer (used on the lock - irl it really looks like an old rusty lock)
The gifts I have from Jesus
Cypress Knee Daiquiri
For weeks, a Filipino teenager Kenneth Milana (pic left) has been irritating residents living in Block 608 Choa Chu Kang Street 62 with his loud drumming and blast music despite repeated requests from neighbors and HDB officers to lower his volume.
For the past year, The BestHubbyEver has had a bee in his bonnet about rising fuel prices. We have a large house heated by an oil powered hot-air furnace. It's been getting plum painful to see the bill after the oil man comes to fill up our tank. Oy!
art-rock influenced sense of shamanic theater, and his penchant for fabulism, and you have a near insurmountable set of reasons why the British won't be clasping the Dots to their collective bosom in the immediate future.
Who was I in those pictures I don’t see myself in anymore? Wasn’t I more confident then? Didn’t I have more faith that a man could love me then? Wasn’t I less self-conscious then?
-Scallop ceviche with wonton crisp paired with McCoy's Farmhouse Ale
How he died is heart-breakingly tragic. My dogs and he seemed to have picked up some fleas from a stray dog that was coming to the house. A man doing some painting work for us, Antonio, said he had the ideal liquid to treat them all....I hesitated about Mr Puss getting it but he said he had given it to his own cat so it would be fine. I held a squiggling Mr Puss while Antonio put the liquid on him. He leapt out of my arms into the undergrowth when all was finished. That was the last time I touched him.
I have been having a really wonderful time being inspired by this amazing spring weather, & I look forward to showing you all some new art through the next days:)
That was until today, when I found myself under the spell of a certain lady with a hot wax wand in her hand. Before you knew it, she was ripping hair off the side of my face like I was Teen Wolf. I was certain at one point that I must be bleeding. Either that or she was using the claws of a cat to pull out my sideburn hairs. When she was done I looked in the mirror - knowing that at this point it was a done deal - and I felt naked. I'd never seen my face without sideburns. Without that unruly bit of hair in front of my ears. It was a bit unnerving. But as I drove home it began to grow on me. And by the time I pulled into the driveway, I was kind of in love with not having sideburns. So maybe the sweet Asian lady was right... this time. I'm a little afraid at what I'll walk out without next time. Eek!
“Well, everyday of our lives we meet approximately 40-50 people, we’d never see again who may have impacted our lives in one way or another, I’m just taking my chance” seconds ticked by again. I held my breath. 24 had nothing on this kind of suspense.
“No-one has been detained yet,” a police spokesman said.
Police corruption comes later in this blog.
CL. A project called: “A suitable job for a woman? Using creative work to challenge perceptions of Sound Arts and Design at LCC and widen participation” is a good example. It focused on two main areas, on the one hand the experiences of female students when they were at college and on the other, the work that they produced. I tried to locate this within a wider context of contemporary research and related areas. Female students often do not see sound as an area of possible study until relatively late may have come through a ‘circuitous’ route. They are often older than male students and more likely to drop out. My interviewees reported that they often felt alienated by aspects of what they felt was a male-dominated culture and excluded from ‘techno-communication’ among male students. Many felt technically unconfident and found technical aspects of the course difficult but often accepted that they didn’t have to learn all the technology themselves to realise their creative ideas and were happy to work with others and collaborate to realise their creative ideas. Women are more attracted to technology when they see how it can be used as a tool to help them realise a creative project.
Brian L. Jones, 44, New York, N.Y.
I think some of these would make quite nice brooches or some other flowers….not that I’ve time for playing with things at the moment!
Mr. McGuire: I just want to say on word to you, just one word.
It is noteworthy that the anti-nuclear struggle has no backing from major political parties, handmaidens all to a development ideology run amok, unhinged from any concern but economic growth rate.
I do not think the Romney has a realistic chance to win, unless the economy turns back down. If that happens, Romney will be able to use the unpopularity of the Obama health care plan to good advantage. But if the economy picks up, it is hopeless for Romney. He is a weak candidate, and he will not have enough money to win.
I know you're all here to find out the winners of Linda's book The Lie That Binds. But first I wanted to share that Sara over at One Word After Another is giving away some books for world book nite on April 23. Go here to enter.
"Happy Valentine's Day."
Sunspots are dark spots that appear on the surface of the sun. They are the location of intense magnetic activity and they are the sites of very violent explosions that produce solar storms.
I didn't show a project today mostly because I wanted to focus on the set-up process, not what you do once it's set-up. Also, this is already a long post. Tomorrow I'll show something finished.
My compound provides a "limo" service with decent drivers. I just book a car when I need to go out. It's pretty simple to use this service.
Bill always knew the right thing to say and because of that we looked
Let us move towards a two-party system and a responsible strong NGO grouping. This is my hope and as a responsible Malaysian, I will be there when called to exercise my right and you can bet many responsible Malaysians will also be there. I believe I am not alone.
Staley’s previous attorney called him “too nuts to be executed” when the courts stopped a scheduled execution in 2005. And Stickles said Staley’s severe mental illness has existed for several years and has been exacerbated by the forced drug regimen Stickles argues was illegally ordered by Salvant.
turned her on
These are now 'mostly' removed and reveal performances as being far better than when heard through a barrage of distracting surface defects.
It's okay that I am WAYYY excited that we finally have a Whole Foods here! Don't laugh at me....this is a big deal for us country people. I've been over there a couple of times, and other than the chicken caesar wrap that made me sick, it's great! I am all over the herbal teas, yo.
Two of our long-time friends surprised us with a visit on Thursday. They both have moved away to a place that's helping them get back on their feet. I felt like it was Christmas, seeing them again. They shared with us how well things are going for them. They looked healthy, and they have "life" back in their eyes again. They also shared how much Mission of Hope and our staff means to them. One of them said, "This (Mission of Hope) is where it all started for me." We snapped a picture of all of us together before they left. I'm still thanking God today for their visit last week. He used it to encourage my soul.
They lied when they told you that immigration brought great benefits to Britain, whereas in truth its main benefit was to Labour's electoral support, and to their (and the Tories') unscrupulous chums in big business who want to exploit cheap immigration in order to keep wages artificially low.
Now is when so many around the world are making their New Year's Resolutions. A few years ago I read about a better way. This is the blog post that inspired me to choose a word for the year, and I have done just that each year and it is amazing how much more powerful this is.
Sunday a lifetime of not quitting was broken. There is no celebration of a PB, no feeling of satisfaction for all the hours of training I put since November, no medal, no cheers, nothing.
I wouldn't say that Michael Haneke's The White Ribbon starts off innocently - far from it - but apart from some of the typical long takes and following shots, it lulls you into something of a disarmed state until about midway through, when certain scenes make it evident exactly who is behind the camera. Despite one storyline that is far sweeter, and seemingly genuinely so, than anything I've seen Haneke do in the past, the majority of the intertwined plot threads focus on the venal, vengeful, and quite probably evil nature of humanity. I like Haneke's films quite a lot, but it can be hard to leave the theater without wanting to lock yourself away for several days until some meager hope in humankind returns.
Christian was asked by colleagues to produce a black feminist theory as an answer to her invalidation (Christian 2130). However, this would not solve the problems faced by those who do not fit neatly into prescribed theories; it merely relieves her position and the position of those with the same identities, that is, other black women. Feminists had done just that when they created their own theory in which they found it easy to speak, yet silenced black women (Christian 2134). Christian notes that those who do not fulfill a movement’s criteria are discredited, as women and those who were not “black enough” were by the Black Arts Movement and as lesbians were by the feminists (Christian 2133, 2135). This is because to include such persons, who upset the boundaries and prescriptions created by the dominant group in a movement, would make the articulation of a theory impossible (Christian 2134).
"AMERICANS: SHUT THE DAMN DOOR!!"
WordArt by ME!!!
I'm trying to remember if I've even been to a big concert since 2005 or 2006. I don't think I have. And I don't miss it. I might make an exception if RUSH comes around again, or I might not.
I don’t know what sort of shoes Moses was wearing. Maybe he had on a nice soft pair of Nike’s or some really comfortable Wolverine’s. All I know is that something happened after he arrived on the scene that day. Or maybe it had happened a week prior when Moses walked his sheep through that place. Whatever it was that happened, God told Moses to take off his shoes because the place where he was standing was sacred ground. And I think Moses had something to do with that.
experienced. The alternating of amazing sessions with life‐changing realizations, with an intense and free communication exchange and plenty of laughter with Marty out of session, has truly given me a renewed purpose, a new viewpoint, a new attitude, a new me.
I pushed for an hour and 45 minutes and then he arrived into our lives. He didn't scream like in the movies... his cry was more subtle which worried me. He was whisked to his own little part of the room where he was looked over a ton. He had a bit of amniotic fluid in his lungs and was having labored breathing so the pediatricians wanted to take him to the NICU. I wasn't able to hold him until over 45 minutes after he was born. The pediatricians were still working on him when they told me they were going to give him to me for some skin to skin time. It felt so nice to have him in my arms. After about 5 minutes the doctors said his breathing had gotten better and he no longer needed to go to the NICU. Thank goodness.
Rule #1: Silence, Please
I like this effect and will use it more often now! Looking forward to the weekend as I'm off perusing charity shops tomorrow afternoon with a friend, always manage to find something fab for my home and then Sunday I'm off to collect a dressing table to transform too.
In the innermost sanctuary of our souls, the divine encounter takes place at a profoundly deep level of our being. Because of the intensely intimate nature of a prayer that is this deep, this personal, this spiritual, it is hard to understand or discuss. It is too holy. Our profoundly intimate encounter with God through prayer in our deepest center is the theme of Carmelite spirituality and the topic of the writings of the Carmelite mystics. Putting words to these experiences and explaining them, usually by way of an analogy, is Carmel’s gift to the world.
There were a lot of people picnicing on the bridge and sipping wine.. or drinking champagne.. only in Paris, right? I noticed the bridge was jammed packed full of locks. I asked, "Why are there all these locks here?" I was told that if you are in love you place a lock on the bridge your love will never be broken. :) The hubs and I were not able to find a lock but when one of our good friends recently got married and we heard they were honey mooning in Paris. We knew that we had to get them a lock.
Bersih 3.0 next Saturday, April 28, will be a crucial public expression of our contempt of the bad laws and bad faith of the Umno-led government, and Umno’s servants in the discredited Election Commission, or EC.
I will be back. It's a threat and a promise. I promise a blog by the end of the evening or at least by the early hours of tomorrow. I know... tomorrow never comes but in this instance it may just have to work.
So the point is to let yourself daydream, go out of focus. How do you incorporate this kind of activity into your writing life, especially when you are working hard on a book project?
Slice crooked neck squash in half and remove the seeds if desired. The larger the squash get the more pronounced the seeds are. Its a personal preference, if you dislike the seeds, remove them, if not leave them in.
Bree’s fingerprint matches one pulled from the body and the police think they have enough for an arrest. But they decide to wait and see if they can get more evidence to make sure they can put Bree away for good.
Sunshine is a tangerine (this pale orange is what I call tangerine FYI) frosty shimmer. It is scattered with small gold hex glitter and large dark orange & golden holographic hex. I think there is also some square glitter in there too but I'm not sure what colour it is, maybe tangerine too? The application was pretty decent, you have to give it a good shake to get the large hex glitters onto your nail but it wasn't difficult or anything. It actually looked like 1 coat gave full coverage but I added another because that's just what I'm used to!! I then topped it with SV Quick Dry top coat.
DEADLINE for email submissions: May 15
For everyone else, please stay tuned as I will be posting details or our spring DT call ASAP :).....
to trigger their sex into overdrive
Americans will be "f**ked" if Barack Obama gets re-elected ... this according to Beach Boys singer Bruce Johnston.
And pray tht we may be delivered
I not only admired the contrasting emotions Ms Maer brought out in all pieces, but also her technique. These pieces are very challenging, yet ms Maer made them seem like a piece of cake. There were only two or three moments when a wrong key was nearly pressed.
The other day we were cuddling in my bed together. I took a drink of soda and it went down the wrong pipe. I choked, I coughed, I turned bright red, tears streamed down my face.
My second favorite thing is the fact that they decided to do a “control” drop test on a known non-gliding ant, in this case a Paraponera clavata (otherwise known as a bullet ant otherwise known as one bad-ass stingy motha whaaaa!). I like the way he just *poofs* down into the understory, you can almost hear the little cartoon falling noise. I would like to tell you that he’s ok. But, while he probably did survive the fall, the rainforest floor is a dangerous place for a lone hormiga.
Most novel development since sliced bread
Dinner was a very flavorful salad with lots of veggies and a lemon-ginger dressing. I did crave some popcorn with our family movie night, but I resisted the temptation and had some "chips" and salsa instead. I also had a terrible lust for some red wine, especially since there's an open bottle spoiling as we speak, but I said no and it feels good not to care.
William and Cheryl danced a jive to "We're Not Gonna Take It Anymore." He was totally unfamiliar with American music and had never heard of heavy metal. Cheryl taught him the moves, but this wasn't his best dance. His Latin roots came through last week during the salsa, and he's always good to look at. The judges agreed. Score - 22.
1 Customer + 4 Neighbors = Double Your Current Customer List
What is truly unreal? Our ego.
Extras: 0
The next morning we met up again with the entire delegation and headed for the parrotfish beach and pavilion. As we arrived, a bell went off and we were treated to the sight of several thousand people (mainly men) running towards the water. I was ushered through the pavilion to the media viewing platform over the water, possibly the best spot to watch the spectacle.
So here was the finished project:
-The Spring Bling event last Saturday was a huge success! After preparing so hard for this party, I thought I would be able to take this week off. However, I now have several custom orders that I received from customers at the party, and as a result I am very busy, and will not be able to kick back this week as previously planned. Oh well, I guess that is a good thing!
Elyssa and her classmates waiting for the event to start
You have chosen to leave our website and cancel your subscription.
1 small carrot, chopped
- She had undergone 39 separate surgeries to repair damage
"As far as I'm concerned, the race for the Icelandic Album of the Year was over the day Benny Crespo's Gang ended a three-year recording process and released their self-titled debut."- Grapevine (Reykjavík's English Language Magazine) - Sveinn Birkir Björnsson
Get two separate bowls, in one put the egg yolk, honey, and apple cider vinegar.In the other put the egg white.
A feature film called “Now You See Me” -- a thriller about “FBI agents tracking a team of illusionists who pull off bank heists during their performances -- filmed in DUMBO Thursday. (Starring Woody Harrelson, Dave Franco, Isla Fisher, Mark Ruffalo and Morgan Freeman.)
But of course, there’s going to be some out there not happy with the move. Naturally, some fans of The Elder Scrolls Series since the Arena days who prefer solo offline play at their own pace with no live jerks mucking about in their game are outraged by the company diving headfirst into a super-saturated market. Well, unfortunately for that crowd, you can’t stop progress.I actually prefer traditional TES gameplay myself, but I’ll keep an eyeball on this one while hoping Bethsoft continues to also craft single player experiences in the series going forward.
I close my argument with an example from the zeitgeist. If you can grant that Folgers’ is at least emblematic of the unpretentious American coffee cup, then you must recognize that said cup is part of our cultural fabric. Like a Norman Rockwall painting, Folgers coffee commercials have socialized us to long for, cherish, and reminisce about the day when a cup of coffee can tell us about ourselves.
The Inquisition was not born out of desire to crush diversity or oppress people; it was rather an attempt to stop unjust executions. Yes, you read that correctly. Heresy was a crime against the state. Roman law in the Code of Justinian made it a capital offense. Rulers, whose authority was believed to come from God, had no patience for heretics. Neither did common people, who saw them as dangerous outsiders who would bring down divine wrath. When someone was accused of heresy in the early Middle Ages, they were brought to the local lord for judgment, just as if they had stolen a pig or damaged shrubbery (really, it was a serious crime in England). Yet in contrast to those crimes, it was not so easy to discern whether the accused was really a heretic. For starters, one needed some basic theological training–something most medieval lords sorely lacked. The result is that uncounted thousands across Europe were executed by secular authorities without fair trials or a competent assessment of the validity of the charge.
#14 – The Five Heartbeats
Another myth about human trafficking is that it only involves adults. Millions of children around the world are crying out in pain and terror over the heartbreaking error of that statement. According to Wikepedia, trafficking in children may come about as an “exploitation of the parents’ extreme poverty. Parents may sell children to traffickers in order to pay off debts or gain income, or they may be deceived concerning the prospects of training and a better life for their children. They may sell their children for labor, sex trafficking, or illegal adoptions.”
perilous fight,
on the plus side, the ridiculously cute dog loves me the most because i freed her from the holly bush when she got alllllll tangled up in that last night and the neighbor was giving us the side-eye for, i dunno, making the dog sit in a bush? come on, dude. the dog smelled something good, and went into the greenery, and came back out having wrapped the leash ALLLLL up in the branches and she isn’t too bright sooooo i had to wrap a blanket around myself and go free her. we aren’t being mean to the dog. she just cannot find her way out of a paper bag.
The tiara adds a nice touch, no? The dress says "sweet little girl," the tiara says "on your knees, bitch."
Somehow I don’t think so.
But tom wonders where is the love and publicity for out Octodads especially the athletes.
karma is a bitch
“I created the film in order to begin a dialogue,” said Adachi. “We showed it in front of many different groups in Hollywood from the Motion Picture Academy, Screen Actors Guild, Producers and Writing Guilds, and the Casting Society of America.”
ferretvamp14
10. Gonna Meet My Maker (Ballard) 4:29
Negative influences are all around and can have a dramatic effect on your self esteem. Don’t let unchecked people and circumstances pull you down. Here are 6 tips on how to minimize your exposure and maintaining strong self esteem in today’s tough environment can be difficult but is not impossible if you follow a few simple guidelines. Here are 6 tips you can use as a starter guide to self improvement.
Rinse and hull strawberries. Hulling means just to cut the tops off real quick with a knife. Feed tops to the chickens or compost for lovely vitamin-C rich soil (great for watering citrus!).
I won't be making this again for myself, but I will make it for the two other weirdos that live in this house. (And no Mrblocko, I'm not referring to the cats.)
I don't know for sure, but i don't think this one has been issued on any of the Nuggets/Pebbles type compilations. But what do i know.. I've been wrong before.
As an aside, I think I have a fetish for fine men’s dress shirts. I can think of nothing else that is so soft and so masculine at the same time. Except for maybe his bed sheets. And the cufflinks. He wasn’t wearing any that I noticed, but OH, HOW I LOVE CUFFLINKS! But I digress. Or do I? Because what I love about this man is his ability to be both soft and masculine. In fact, he is the personification of a fine woven cotton — beautiful, strong, gentle. A good man with a good heart. A family man.
My Grandfather's idea of gardening however involves me spending what feels like neverending hours weeding and digging stinky compost into the soil!
The characters were what I found lacking. Though the stories were compelling, I couldn't connect to anyone. The women especially were shells with no flesh. They didn't invoke feeling or connection. I'm not sure if it was because of the chronology in which the story was told or the voice of the narrator. Maybe it was a combination of the two that left me feeling disconnected.
What are your feelings on the digital transition to music, i.e. file-sharing? Have you been effected by the fact that people can download your music without paying or do you believe this transition has enriched the music community?
Put your thinking caps on...Cook/bake or even make salads/smoothies anything which is colourful and healthy to attract your kid.
Place a medium skillet over medium-high heat. Combine the panko with 2 teaspoons of olive oil and mix with a fork to blend. Add the mixture to the skillet and toast the panko, stirring frequently, until light golden brown. Remove from the heat and let cool to room temperature.
Sat, 10:30pm: Merde. Ghana won.
Next it was the Manchester Literature Festival. I attended the gala event for the Manchester Fiction Prize, a very interesting debate about prize culture, which I reported on here, a tribute to innovative novelist B S Johnson which sadly dented my admiring view of him with some early films I couldn't help finding adolescent, two excellent Comma Press events - an evening with European short story writers and an afternoon reading by Jane Rogers from their Litmus anthology (stories from science) with a discussion with scientist Martyn Amos - and a very moving tribute to poet Linda Chase who sadly died in April.
Principle and the Liberal-Democrats are about as compatible as oil and water. Understand that and you understand everything. There is no principle that is too dear for the Lib-Dems to jettison. Remember all those pledges against locking up child refugees? Well forget them because they are still being locked up. Remember theri opposition to control orders? Well they still have them too (but they are renamed!).
The products were shipped to Arizona, California, Colorado, Florida, Illinois, Michigan, Minnesota, Nebraska, Oregon, South Carolina, Tennessee, Utah, Wisconsin as well as overseas destinations.
Into your mind as the consciousness withdrew
“I think next year is the year,” said Pendleton, whose grandfather raised hemp in western Kentucky.
I'd walked into the Guggenheim Museum, late afternoon. There is a small fountain in the generic, contemporary shape of a fish, and as I am always wont to do, I stopped there to toss in pennies and make a wish for myself and two people who were not with me in person, but are always with me in spirit.
The photos feature Lancome's Erika F eyeshadow and MAC Hocus Pocus only.
Deion is now well nourished, getting a proper little chubster and although we are having a few teething problems with the tube site, its still worth it. Life is slowly getting back on an even keel!
The recent news that another of Maia’s bottles had been found in the middle of the Coral Sea—on Huon Reef, a month after she tossed it in at Chesterfield Reef, some 284 nautical miles distant, made me wonder about the history and enduring romance of a message in a bottle. Because—as mail goes—it’s about as reliable as Correos de Mexico.
Ann: I knew something was wrong. Claire flopped down and her right arm just dropped to the floor, and she was just talking garbage, not making any sense. I rang her sister, Paula, who lives down the street. She came and saw that Claire’s eyes were dilated, so we called an ambulance immediately.
Specifications
dozen cookies, enough
Okay, so, this one is way off the grid.
Edit: I've been getting this error message as I've been leaving comments too but the comment still gets published. Just click your 'Back' button to get the blog to display again, and then refresh.....your comment should now be displaying.
"At your service, gentlemen." she answered them in the standard formula of the duel, and all four withdrew to the dark gardens without to settle the affair. La Maupin defeated all three at once, though whether she killed or merely disarmed and injured them, I cannot say.
I was sent some samples from Victorian Disco Cosmetics to review a little under 2 months ago. I was really taken by the company's understated geeky branding, and was excited by all the positive reviews I'd read. The shadows swatched beautifully, with only the slightest hint of sheerness. Other bloggers had raved about the pigmentation of the shadows, so I figured I had nothing to worry about.
This tree of life is first mentioned way back in Genesis 2:9″
to wound long scarred
Ben added:
After outlining the key provisions of the Act, Fredericka reviewed the intended cost-splitting aspects of enforcement: 75% of the enforcement cost is generally to be borne by rights owners, the other 25% by the ISPs. She also reviewed provisions of the Ofcom code which seek to address the regulatory aspects of enforcement, time limits, the content of notification (giving some examples) and the record-keeping responsibilities of ISPs which will enable copyright owners to bring proceedings. Data must be deleted after 12 months, regardless of whether proceedings have been brought in respect of an IP address's owner or not.
The only problem is that while many people are buying the right hair care products for their hair, they forget to follow basic hair care regimens that will guarantee the health and beauty of their tresses. Additionally, many are also causing needless damage to their hair by participating in unhealthy hair care behavior.
My library
YoTrip
G/son loved it, he thought it was hilarious.
And every day Levi says new things as if he’s been saying them all along. (Love the seemingly easy flow of words that pour out in every day conversation.)
One more luckily - this littlest one does not know YET that the steppeing on the footpedal is an essential part of using a sewing machine. He sews. If youle him nonstop. Until the day before toda he only pressed my buttons, but after watching yesterday and this morning his sisters closely, there is no more stopping.
I absolutely loved Anne of Green Gables. She’s so dramatic and wears cool clothes and has red hair.
Tickets can be purchased in advance or at the door.
Am I the only quilter who completely misjudges the length of time that it's going to take to finish a project? I worked on this all weekend and still need to bind it.
The mountains are frozen umbrellas used by the cats on a sunny day
Is ever enough for you cuz may be
Joel’s death has given me a perspective about abortion most people don’t have, though I have no idea what sort of man he might have become or who he would have voted for. For me, all babies, born or unborn, ought to be cherished, regardless of the circumstances in which they were conceived.
Hello everyone! At Ty's new job, he works Saturdays. I don't and I don't have a car. So, I think Saturday will be my most oft blogging day. And today is Saturday! Aren't you lucky? :P
working by steps back into the downpour.
Through the years of increasing affluence and motor vehicle registrations, the initial small parking areas gradually encroached upon lawns and playgrounds, and pressure arose from late arrivals to be granted equal accommodation privileges or 'rights'. Supervision and rationing of parking spaces became administrative nightmares. No parking charges were levied, yet the users wanted ever improved facilities - asphalt paving, reservation signs, engine heater, prompt snow removal and the like. Patronage of public transport facilities, of course, decline in the vicinity."
We are slowly getting settled in and wading through errands and red tape. We should get our teudot zeihut (citizen identity cards) by Wenesday, and that will hopefully smooth out some of the beurocratic obstacles. The kids start school September 1.
Eventually Conrad will come to get the footage. He wishes to fire him, but Tyler steps in. Tyler believes this is a bad idea since he knows how the Graysons really ended Flight 197.
Happy 1st Birthday Stitch Steals! To celebrate the big event, Stephanie has gotten some awesome steals for you today to help you organize all of the steals you've collected over the past year (and make room for more!)
11.The Pillcrushers "Is It True" from Welcome to The World
There's only one thing any pastor should be preaching to parents about their children.
- In making the crust, Dorie gives an approximate measure of flour, allowing an extra 1/4 cup to be added as needed. I didn't use the extra, as the texture seemed soft but still doughy without it. The dough was very soft, and with so much butter it warmed up quickly
Police Captain Thulani Zwane said the man was outside the sports club when four armed men approached him.
Karl at writing at Hot Air nails it! Thomas E. Mann and Norman J. Ornstein are ignoring the biggest problem of all created by the Democrats –Run Away Spending
The book was blissfully lacking vampires, even with the title suggesting otherwise. This book has the same feel as Sherrilyn’s Dark Hunter series, and although it is mentioned that vampires do exist in this alternate reality, none seem to live in Atlanta. Just Demons and other immortal beings, all being unnoticed by the thousands of humans that live next door.
For many people, this is the game we’ve been waiting since November for…
pulls up in front of a falling building
Don’t over think it. Just write from the heart. You want to feel their emotions, not think them.
So overall a rather relaxing if somewhat fish themed day. But to finish things off...
But, does it?
The Samsung PN50A760 is a 50-inch Plasma HDTV. Like other Plasma TVs, it has a wide viewing angle and an excellent refresh rate and like other HDTVs, it offers outstanding images and sound. It has some great qualities of its own, though, which set it apart from the rest of today’s Plasma HDTVs and all HD televisions in general.
I am also almost finished with a great book that my wife gave me, “Once a Runner” by John L. Parker. The book is fantastic and a must read for any runner. Here is one of my favorite quotes from the book. In this quote, the book’s protagonist Quenton Cassidy, a middle distance runner at a southern American University, is thinking about the difficulites in explaining to lay people exactly what it means to be a runner. In my opinion, this quote epitomizes the essence of the runner, both elite and otherwise:
Hear that faint hissing sound? That’s the sound of a myth quietly dying….
"I am sorry he told me, but you don't need me- I didn't teach you anyway, you were the teacher."
3 improvement
Risk of maxillofacial trauma: moderate
I’m a big fan of wood – rather than wire or plastic – clothes hangers; they fit any aesthetic, and quality ones will last for years and years. Plus, I think they give closets a boutique-y, I’ve-got-it-together feel, which is especially nice during those I-so-don’t-have it-together moments. I have a whole bunch of these Ikea ones ($3.99/8), curved and flat because I didn’t pay attention to the difference when I bought them. The flat ones don’t take up as much space, and the little indentions for hanging tops and dresses make them more versatile.
Embellishment: Pink Crystal
There are also other valid reasons for having more than one key pair per e-mail address… such as:
of stars as sacred crown,
This week our hostess is Sarah Gough - THinkING STAMPS and she's asking us to Get Wordy! For this challenge, use a sentiment stamp to create a background or layer on your card by stamping it repeatedly.
Next I wanted to try taking the stripe pattern all the way up the pouch. I had no idea how long it would take to figure this out.
It might amuse you, my dear readers, to know that I had to take a full blown psychological assessment for reasons that will hopefully become more apparent in the near future when I am a little freer to discuss the reasons for same. In the meantime, I thought you might find parts of one of the assessment exercises interesting. I was asked to do a sentence completion exercise. I have no idea what insight this exercise gave them into my psyche, but apparently it didn't trip any major alarms.
Becky bobbed a shallow curtsy and then backed towards the door, eager to return to her room.
I wonder whether someday I will discover the joy of writing as well.
75g flour
The movie was restricted to 18 and over.
First, pre-heat the oven to 375. Then stir together the flour, cocoa, baking soda, salt, and sugar. Afterwards, you're supposed to combine the wet ingredients in a separate bowl (adding the vinegar last, remember now) but I always just dump 'em into the same bowl as the dry stuff. Just remember to add the vinegar last!! Also, I should probably mention that it is not in your best interests to over-stir it. Keep the stirring to a minimum when using vinegar. Bake for 25-30 minutes, although that really depends on the oven. This recipe makes 12 BIG cupcakes!
a marionette
will be introduced on the day
I’m starting to find the topic of the future of technology quite an interesting one. Until now the march of progress has been fairly straight forward – faster, smaller, lower power, connectivity, but I think I see innovation slowing.
But anyway.
family flag) was draped over her coffin at the funeral.
In fact, aspartame is a sweet poison developed to make people sick so the pharmaceutical industry can sell expensive medication to ‘treat’ the chronic diseases that are caused by it’s use.
I’m totally in love with this cover, and now I’m even more eager to see the book published in print as well as on Kindle. To that end, I’ve upped my research efforts, and I’ve decided to post all my research on here in a couple of weeks, which will include detailed comparisons of most of the current self-publishing options. So, watch out for that because it really will be a very useful resource.
So again we have been conditioned that clothing or certain items of clothing are a necessity when really it is just a societal construct!
When the asparagus is finished, I lay it out on a sheet of foil on my countertop to cool. I have granite counters and the stone helps to draw the heat off the asparagus, but air cooling on any surface is a good idea before refrigerating the spears. It's never a good idea to put hot or warm food directly into the fridge.
I knew the end was near when I saw the last (and first) Petronas station. The ground was very much flat again, thank goodness. Crossing the finish line, I was still feeling fresh, although the legs were badly stretched, no thanks to Ammah and her children. I didn’t set any goal for this race because there are no other races of the same distance to compare it with. To my understanding, 25 km is a rather unusual distance. But my average pace had improved, in comparison with my best half marathon pace. So, that was an achievement, I thought. Also, I’d completed the course injury-free and without consuming any energy gels.
Granted, they are aware that they do need to be careful about a few things: viruses, hackers, identity thieves, Nigerian princes who want to give them millions of dollars — all the standard stuff. But there are some lesser known dangers of the Internet that can steamroll your life like Paris Hilton stampeding towards a line of cocaine
Brilliant, at the news of a shortage petrol sales increased by 81% and diesel sales follow suit with an increase of 43%. To put this in perspective, if we were all currently stuck in a lift and running out of air every person who owns a 4×4 or sports car with a fuel tank like a bottomless pit would be running around waving their arms and taking the deepest breathes possible. The concept of a crisis is to ration what we are about to lose in the hope we can make it last until the problem is resolved, not grab more than your fair share and shove it in your shed next to the rusty BBQ.
Despite my lukewarm feelings about the first book of the trilogy, I’ve pushed ahead and am mostly glad for it. Catching Fire is somewhat better paced than The Hunger Games in the front end, for starters. The front half is a lot of talking and Katniss wavering in her feelings for her two suitors, but it is peppered with actual suspense and moments of dread, helping to buoy the tale along. The Quell sequence is somehow not as action-packed as I’d expected, which is a bit of a downside, but is still more enjoyable than the Games for reasons I’ll elaborate on. Overall, it serves as a good transition book, although it is still plagued by problems.
Where, in another time and age,
6 cups Egyptian rice (short grain)
I always spend part of Monday building background knowledge and gearing kids up for the story. Most of my kids know what it means to invent, so it was time to dig deeper.
2 teaspoons dried basil leaves
That was the start of it. I did exactly the same thing they had done in the store before. I did exactly the same thing that tech support Tier 3 or whoever she spoke to told her to do. They did not resolve the situation. I did.
Weird random dream or a peek into the inner workings of my subconscious? Discuss. :)
It’s become one of these shows where I just have to see it through. The first few series were actually very good, but beyond that it’s been mindless TV aimed more at the E4 crowd than me – and yet I still watch it out of a misguided sense of loyalty and mild curiosity.
The words have literal bite to them. He can feel the marks they leave on his bare skin, on arms. This is, after all, shaman initiation. He was stupid to believe the foe he must face would be a physical one.
Nasty Pop: Crow
The current furore over Richard Hughes’ 50 day suspension by Indian racing authorities is very strange to the British race follower as it was given for not following the trainer’s instructions – a reason which rather negates the use of one of the best tacticians in the modern sport, and seems pretty impossible to prove conclusively. After all the trainer is hardly likely to own up to giving the wrong advice in the first place! However the BHA is in a pretty bad place as they have to honour the reciprocal agreement to abide by bans “awarded” by foreign racing authorities. It is perhaps lamentable that the BHA finds itself complicit in preventing Hughes’ bid on the championship and in depriving racing of a superb jockey – but there is little the BHA can do. However this supposes that the original ruling was fair – if not the ban can be overturned and we wait to see if Hughes will go to court to challenge this further.
security men had been deployed
They play it safe are quick to assasinate what they do not understand
that classic marital exchange
When I was still a senior in high school, I had a few friends who were army wives and who lived in base housing. One evening, I went to see my friend Paula, but she was not yet home. I decided to sit in the backyard and wait for her, as I knew she would be there shortly. It was a nice summer evening so I sat, in my skirt, in the grass. I had been there for about 15 minutes and I had an itch right on the inside of my right butt cheek. I tried to ignore it, but it got worse and worse with each passing minute. Finally, I reached behind, under my skirt, and just as I began to scratch that insistent itch, I thought to myself, “It will be just my luck if Paula comes around that corner and sees me scratching my butt under my skirt…” and, of course, at exactly that moment, she did walk right up behind me and asked how I was. I jumped nearly a foot off the ground as I quickly, with the reddest face, removed my hand and stood up! If that wasn’t bad enough, I now had to follow her inside and visit for a while before I could escape and allow my very bruised ego and deflated self-esteem to heal. She never mentioned it, but every time I saw her after that day, I had this mental picture and my face would once again turn red.
A great ongoing program they offer: Coffee and Conversation, weekly on-going drop-in groups for survivors, are provided three times per week. Survivors meet in a welcoming atmosphere for informal discussions, remembrance and celebration of life. These groups are offered free of charge and are conveniently located in the northern suburbs and in West Rogers Park.
I blame the whole sad creepy thing on that ophthalmologist. He dilated my eyes, peered inside my pea-brain and basically said, "What are you doing here? Most of my patients are in their 80s...there's nothing wrong with your eyes." So I simultaneously apologized and thanked him (like any good Canadian would) then returned to the waiting area where I texted my wife: "dilated and waiting." Her oh-so-compassionate reply? "Happy birthing!"
Is anyone here surprised? I’m not.
Updates will periodically be posted here, so if you don't follow the blog, you can bookmark this page and periodically check back to see what's new.
I'm so glad I made up with my sewing machine! I've been having fun playing with it again; every few months it just decides to act up and I have to wrestle it back into submission. I was very pleased with how my sewing machine sewed onto the netting. For the "ribbon" on the left, I first used a seam stitch and then folded the netting in half, and sewed that together with a straight stitch. I really like how funky it is! For the netting piece underneath the tape-backing flower, I used a loose straight-stitch and then scrunched up the netting until I could make a little rosette, which I glued onto the the flower piece.
I can't wait to get going with the other kids' rooms!
My daughter and I spent most of the evening making up two songs. The first one started as some sort of nursery rhyme song about a turtle. I couldn’t figure out the tune on the guitar, so we just came up with a new tune using the same words.
The ANC retained control of the Nelson Mandela Bay Metro with 51.9% of the votes.
Find a hole in [Image]the ground – instead of thinking of it as an inconvenience, look at it as an impromptu open-air exhibition or archaeological dig.
There is no doubt in my mind that the astronomers of ancient times where also the surveyors, engineers, architects, planners and builders. These gifted and privileged men also became the decision makers and the lawmakers in their respective communities. When those leaders passed on they were remembered and honoured by members of their tribes, and they had every right to do so! Even God Himself saw the common sense of using these wise men as the patriarchs of His Written Word.
I only went to the Raymond Revuebar once, in the 1980s, when it was hosting alternative comedy shows. My clear memory is that regular comedy evenings were being run there by a young Eddie Izzard, though a quick Google tells me it was the Comic Strip.
Word Count:
(c) consequently encourages wild conspiracy theories involving Zionist and Hindu designs on Pakistan,
ROWAN OF THE MOOR is a Paranormal/Historical (with romantic elements) single novel of 100,000 words and takes place in fourth-century, Roman occupied Britain.
Bennett: “No, you know the stuff that falls from the sky?”
Place the dark chocolate in a heatproof bowl over a pan of barely simmering water. Stir until melted and smooth.
YAY for snow!
Mama in the nest with daddy by her side. What a cute photo!! As you can see, we are still nesting, getting ready for the grand day and the beginning of parenting.
So I'm being quiet and having a rifle through some of the lovely books I've been bought. Last night I snuggled in bed with the Strictly annual that Eldest bought for me.
1/2tsp Red chilly powder
“Well,” he says, after thinking about it, “Mostly about what they thought or what they’d hoped would happen, or what a dip s**t move someone would make.”
"When the Son of Man comes in his glory, and all the angels with him, he will sit on his throne in heavenly glory. 32 All the nations will be gathered before him, and he will separate the people one from another as a shepherd separates the sheep from the goats. 33 He will put the sheep on his right and the goats on his left. 34 "Then the King will say to those on his right, 'Come, you who are blessed by my Father; take your inheritance, the kingdom prepared for you since the creation of the world. 35 For I was hungry and you gave me something to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me something to drink, I was a stranger and you invited me in, 36 I needed clothes and you clothed me, I was sick and you looked after me, I was in prison and you came to visit me.' 37 "Then the righteous will answer him, 'Lord, when did we see you hungry and feed you, or thirsty and give you something to drink? 38 When did we see you a stranger and invite you in, or needing clothes and clothe you? 39 When did we see you sick or in prison and go to visit you?' 40 "The King will reply, 'I tell you the truth, whatever you did for one of the least of these brothers of mine, you did for me.' 41 "Then he will say to those on his left, 'Depart from me, you who are cursed, into the eternal fire prepared for the devil and his angels. 42 For I was hungry and you gave me nothing to eat, I was thirsty and you gave me nothing to drink, 43 I was a stranger and you did not invite me in, I needed clothes and you did not clothe me, I was sick and in prison and you did not look after me.' 44 "They also will answer, 'Lord, when did we see you hungry or thirsty or a stranger or needing clothes or sick or in prison, and did not help you?' 45 "He will reply, 'I tell you the truth, whatever you did not do for one of the least of these, you did not do for me.' 46 "Then they will go away to eternal punishment, but the righteous to eternal life."
Source: USGS NEIC (WDCS-D)
But oh our foes and ah our friends.
There is a pulling sensation when the correct muscles are contracted. Weaker and stronger contractions are practiced until the PC muscles can be squeezed at will.
And OH MY GOODNESS!!! I immediately asked Brandon if we too could have a baby Pigmy Hippo. I mean look at all that cuteness!I totally see why my dad wanted one. Alas though B said no,even if it would score major points with my dad.
Cut your tortillas into 8ths and spread them out on a baking sheet. Do not overlap. Spray them with cooking spray, sprinkle with cinnamon and sugar mixture and then lightly spray again with cooking spray. Bake for 10 minutes in an oven preheated to 350 degrees. After baking let cool completely for 15 minutes. Repeat steps for remaining tortillas.
OK,I cheated and set the camera up near the bird feeder by the shed,the only place that I knew the birds would be.
We have been kept in check by a cocktail of debt and aspiration. Both are related and are products of each other but are effective in keeping us from rocking the boat because we are scared. We aspire to be better off, to move up the social ladder, to be influential & etc. Debt is a symptom of this. We aspire to things we can’t afford so get in debt, debt that we aspire to pay off. Because we are saddled with this debt all we look to is the next pay-day, the next bonus or promotion. This cycle has been propagated by business and the free market – it is a cycle that has failed us and a system that we are now bailing out. But for what? So it can begin again.
There's hardly any shore in the place. The only shallow part is the coral reef then it drops into 180 feet (I think) of deep water. The diving board and slide stand side by side. Everyone's required to wear a vest so it's pretty safe.
Also here are a couple of properties that might make good investments:
Alice Springs
I’ve started another one of my ‘home’ projects, attempting to chart some trends in awards winners for genre fiction. So far, I’m only about a quarter of the way through. You have no idea how much screen scraping is involved.
I have long had a desire to make blackforest cakes with the tinned cherries all ready and waiting. I decided upon a chocolate cake recipe that also gave good results to my palet previously called chocolate cream filled cupcakes apparently from Food and Wine. Of course I didn't fill them with the cream I just used the chocolate cake recipe, with Dutch cocoa which I found hard to find in my local area.... do we have gourmet delis here??
As I approached the house I realized that I had forgotten to take my own advice about making a pit-stop before leaving from work.
Cherry Lynn Designs - Cutting Die - Pair of Fern
I mounted my photos onto small pieces of chipboard to make them pop up a
she'll be my mirror
In fact, the media will probably give us our next President, whether it is the same person, or another; it will likely be someone the media (read major news channels) decides upon, and supports.
Sounds Like: Their debut Habits is filled with Eighties pop meshed with bombastic alt-rock choruses — like the Killers playing backup for Duran Duran. "Your Surrender" is a U2-style singalong, "1983" is a bratty dose of keyboard-driven pop punk and Hot 100 single "Animal" is an irresistibly catchy lovesick dance tune. The band's is pretty clear about its inspiration: "New Wave is basically all I listen to," says Glenn.
How cheap is too cheap? In the quest to answer this, today I’m necking Sainsbury’s basics. 91p for 4, 2% lager, 0.9 units a can. A while back I was tempted to try Carling C2, a 2% lout, due to a tempting promotion in the Mecca of beer that is Tesco. The offer was try it, and if you don’t like it, your money back. All you had to do was send the cardboard cover back, with your receipt, and get your money back. On the question “why don’t you like it?” I answered “its piss”, my money returned, before I’d even bothered to actually try it. That’s how cheap I am. Interestingly when I did try it, months later, I discovered I was correct! However this, as with many brand extensions, is rarely in the bargain bin. Often 2% Carling is dearer than 4%. I’ve never figured why anyone would want 2% Carling anyway. If driving, a shandy is nicer, and at home you’re not driving anywhere.
With the 13 point plan as well to gain the support of Singaporean Indians and Chinese, Singapore would revert to the 14th state again. As for Syariah, it can be applicable upon voluntary submission by Muslims. But that can be applied as an option for adults and not imposed summarily on Muslims, if Singaporean Malays are ever to vote for re-assimilation with Malaysia via plebiscite.
kick salt water
Wonder Boy's visit to the pediatric orthopedic surgeon went fine. Poor guy, he is apparently prone to muscle spasms that cause him to hunch over and scuttle around for a week or so from time to time. We can now confirm that his bones are normal, but as far as getting rid of the muscle spasms? No one can say. I have some vague memory from pregnancy that potassium helps muscle spasms, so I'm stuffing the poor boy with bananas.
Philip Levine – What Work Is
Aside from the amazing scent, this is a really great body scrub. It's fluffy and soft, so it's gentle and non-harsh, but it still does a great job at getting skin soft and smooth.
Until next time! Thanks for reading!
First item of business today - In case you haven't seen it, here's this week's cover of People Magazine:
They are giant.
I’m a dreamer, but I’m not the only one
Bukowski often spoke of Los Angeles as his favorite subject. In a 1974 interview he said, ‘You live in a town all your life, and you get to know every bitch on the street corner and half of them you have already messed around with. You’ve got the layout of the whole land. You have a picture of where you are…. Since I was raised in L.A., I’ve always had the geographical and spiritual feeling of being here. I’ve had time to learn this city. I can’t see any other place than L.A.’
I spy one that would work great in my office, but I’m going to try to recover the chair I have first. If it’s a colossal fail, IKEA will be calling my name. :)
That it's still here, 35 years on. Longevity is a great comfort.
So why are we against life skills right now? First off we want Max around typical kids. How else is he going to see what is appropriate and what's not? Life skills classes are going to have lower standards. The behaviors he has is going to be somewhat excepted in that class. If we want Max to grow up and be around other adults who are 'typical' why not have him around them as a kid at school too? I'm not saying being in a life skills class is bad but it is not what we want at this time in Max's life.
“You loser!” cries the female. “Do you think I have to let you into my pants if I want to eat you?!”
Well, today was the day that it finally snowed. Instead of posting that fact on Facebook with a certain degree of slack-jawed amazement, I thought I'd write a little something about it on here. Mainly mocking what I saw on Reporting Scotland earlier. I really need to watch Reporting Scotland more often. Not because it's any good, in fact, quite the opposite. Some of my best entries have come from mocking Jackie Bird and her friends.
Probably true. And what a great thing it is.
heres the full webrip video of the Buzzcocks set
Learning to eat with the "seasons" is something I am really excited about not only will it be great to support local business, but it's fresh and organic and will teach us to eat and cook with the vegetables and fruit that is seasonally available.
Winner: A Vintage Cantillon, around 30 yrs old and covered in bird shit
Hmmm, that makes it sound like a mystery or horror novel… Actually it’s one of the most touching romance stories I’ve read so far!
So far so good. Knock on wood. We’ve just been hanging in there. We decided that we want to be in a committed relationship with each other and because we love each other. We’re raising three daughters between the two of us and that’s important for us to present a strong foundation and a strong family unit for them. So we don’t want to be the type of people that have significant others coming in and out of our kids lives and once we decided to be committed to each other, that’s what it’s been and going strong for about four years now. Babies, I don’t think. I would have another baby for him because I’m so in love with him so I would have another baby but he doesn’t want to have anymore children and marriage, you know we both have been there and done that and, we have that ring, we have that wedding, we have that piece of paper and those things were the most tumultuous relationships that we have been in so now we’re just making a commitment to each other on another level-spiritually, emotionally and physically- that we can just stand behind and stand solid on. We really don’t need the paper.
Yes, I'm self-publishing because I hope to do well. I hope BTPM sells--I hope it sells A LOT. But in the end, I'm more concerned about putting out a good story. I'm not in this to turn a quick buck. The chances of doing that are pretty low, even in the best of circumstances, so it CAN'T be about that in my mind. The only thing I can control is the quality of the story I put before readers. If it takes me three months--or three years--to finish the second book, I WILL NOT publish before I think it's the best story I can possibly produce. It has to be that way. It's MY name on that cover--those are MY characters and story. I want to do them justice. I won't put them out there when they're not ready--even if it means I may miss out on money-making opportunities.
So as you can tell I haven’t updated in a while! BUT it’s for good reason! We bought a house!!!!!
My heart is mine in the place of hearts,
So from now through 1/9/2012 11:59 PM ET we are going to let you try any* 2 bottles of Zoya Nail Polish for FREE on ZOYA.COM. All you pay is the standard shipping charges.
Krishnamurti changed his tone and rhythm. He spoke now calmly, with incisiveness. “I will tell you what a religious man is. First of all, a religious man is a man who is alone— not lonely, you understand, but alone— with no theories or dogmas, no opinion, no background. He is alone and loves it— free of conditioning and alone— and enjoying it. Second, a religious man must be both man and woman— I don’t mean sexually— but he must know the dual nature of everything; a religious man must feel and be both masculine and feminine. Third,” and now his manner intensified again, “to be a religious man, one must destroy everything— destroy the past, destroy one’s convictions, interpretations, deceptions— destroy all self-hypnosis— destroy until there is no center; you understand, no center. ” He stopped.
The Universal Declaration of Linguistic Rights states that ‘every linguistic community has the right for its language to be used as an official language in its territory’. In Finland for example, the State has two official languages, Finnish and Swedish, alongside four other official minority languages: Sami, Romani, Finnish Sign Language and Karelian.
about this great leader. I am impressed that he stood up for his high principles that changed America forever!
With the exception of Antarctica, New Zealand, and Iceland, the Peregrine is found around the globe. Twenty-two subspecies are recognized throughout the world. Their great powers of flight have enabled them to establish nesting populations in the Arctic, and as far south as Tasmania, South Africa, and the Falkland Islands.
I think part of the reason I love taking photos of people is that some of them absolutely fascinate me. So many worlds to be exposed to.
If you haven’t figured it out by now, may God have mercy on your life and soul.
1966 THE LOVE STATUE aka THE LOVE DRUG (also writer)
How many people in a group?
Christmas is, for most, a special time of year and, while Australia is not as blessed as its northern hemisphere neighbours for Festive Ales from many breweries, it is, nonetheless, well served for those prepared to seek. Limited release specials from some of our own craft brewers as well as the availability of overseas offerings means we don’t have to miss out.
Close minded people were the biggest hurdle for me to find my place in a creative world. It has taken me to not accept the thoughts that there is no point in trying, because hardly anybody actually succeeds in those fields, and instead telling myself i have nothing to lose trying. Anybody will NOT succeed at ANYTHING they want to do if they don’t ever try. If you give it your all and fail, at least you can say you did and it didn’t work, but if you don’t ever even give it a shot, then you will without a doubt never make it in that field. You are taking your odds down to 0% chance if you never try.
And you will do the Covenantal all the time
It impossible you’d be
As I look at the sky line of London my heart sinks. Its a muddle, where gaint concrete steel and glass monoliths shadow portland stone beauty built by stonemasons. 200 years ago without cement . So closely alligned these stones that no moss of any king gets in the crack. Now I.m not against progress and some modern architecture is quite stunning to. Its just a matter of position . Old London the square mile city should have been left alone. And the new steel and concrete one built as is now happening on the Isle of Dogs. Also any major city in Britain should have been treated the same.
Pardon my ADHD post, I have a few things that I am just giddy about. First of all, I would like to thank global warming, climate change, Mother Nature, George Bush or whomever else maybe responsible for the 80 degree weather we have been having. Yes, I really meant to type E-I-G-H-T-Y. Holy hell, the last thing I ever expected in the middle of March was to be turning on the central air. You people that live south have to know that we usually still have a ton of snow and we usually are still in our parkas. So this is a HUGE deal for us.
"perpetual beach" frame-of-mind for a while
get carted off to the barn!!
That statement caught me off guard for a minute.
I'm looking forward to seeing my brother and his family and enjoying the history, culture, WINE, espresso, GELATO, and Pasta a'more!
So. It's been a while since I've posted. Truly, it's not because I haven't been painting. I have lots and lots of starts but not so many finishes because I have been doing a lot of alla prima figurative and plein air painting and no small still lifes. Now that the summer heat is upon us, I will be spending much more time in the studio finishing those starts and developing new paintings. I am officially renewing my commitment to blogging regularly, but adjusting my goal to a more realistic (for me) three times per week. If I can get up at 4:30am three times a week to run and left weights, I certainly ought to be able to post a new painting three times a week!
your plenty made me fat and miserable.
Far from having an axe to grind, Cook, who died in 2005 after spells as Foreign Secretary and Leader of the House, is unabashed in his admiration of what Blair and the Labour Party achieved between 1997 and 2003. When even your staunchest allies feel obliged to resign from cabinet and then be so publicly critical of your thinking as this, you must have put in some pretty lousy days at the office.
Channa dal : 1/4 cup
Miracle is defined as an event or action that apparently contradicts known scientific laws; a remarkable thing.
A roller coaster of a romance between a divorced dad and a dance teacher.
And now for failing to answer her once has made her to insult me and call me a “jerk” and this after I tried to contact her one day before and leave her a message to establish where we should go. That was too much, I could felt the Goddess being killed when she called me a “jerk”, and for what? For loving her…. it was too much… the Goddess lay down in agony bleeding to death and vanishing from my heart like it was never there. I can’t even say I miss her, it is like she was never there. I am again just me, alone like I always was because the Goddess of Love was an illusion. It was only in my mind, I’ve created her because I believed in a concept that no one can follow: that of a pure unselfish love.
Skin: Tattered Rose, Vintage Photo, Walnut Stain
Laid not your hand on me.
The Wild March Wind Today . . .
red chili pepper flakes, optional
To support the launch I authored a landscape review (another first) of the U.K.’s hyperlocal sector. Its aim was simple; to use examples from across the U.K. — and around the world — to offer insight and inspiration to hyperlocal practitioners, wherever they may be.
One Fresh Cup is the ideal product for the any traveler to kick-start a morning with a great cup of coffee in the hotel room. The disposable, built-in filter makes it convenient to brew a cuppa from real ground coffee, which I'm sure will taste far superior to drinking dissolved instant coffee granules. I was most impressed that they offered my favorite coffee variety, Sumatra, along with my husband's favorite, French Roast. I can't wait to try my Sumatra sample on my next trip.
So there it is, we still have 21 days to go and my golden pints are in, cheers for the beers, opinions and general friendship guys, you have all made my year better!
News of the extravagant smokes has blown across the Chinese internet on Thursday. Some outraged users wrote that they could easily live for a whole month for the price of a single cigarette. Others claim that the producers of such expensive cigarettes only rely on the growth of corruption in Chinese society.
The book is short, and that could be fine, but too many things were crammed in and none were particularly fleshed out. Plot threads were minimally developed and some were even dropped all together with no resolution. The supernatural parts didn't have enough explanation for me either. It was a fun read for sure, but the more I think about it the more I can find to nitpick.
Curiously, in 1914, the Théâtre des Arts even hosted sessions of France's upper parliamentary house, the Senate! The story goes that the Germans had launched a major offensive on Paris in June of that year. The French government therefore fled to Bordeaux to ensure that the entire country could continue to be governed while Paris was under siege. Paris was saved after the first Battle of the Marne in September 1914, and the government returned to the French capital on November 18th.
FTC disclosure: I received a copy of this book from the publisher in exchange for an honest review. All opinions are my own.
The two misunderstood, much-maligned pariahs of their respective worlds. No, not Adnams and Forrest specifically, but brown bitter and chardonnay; the former often persecuted in craft beer circles for being dull, boring and characterless, the latter the tart of wine, going anywhere with anyone, so much so that it had a fictional WAG named after it. Can either cover themselves in glory?
Laurie and John from the famous firm of Private Detectives ‘Landis & Landis’ are enjoying their holiday in Buenos Aires when they are asked to solve the problem of the missing Sapphire by the store owner Quesada.
Paper to be used: Square, any size; use large paper to practice with at first.
A few minutes later, Wesley has returned and he and I are ready for his verdict.
This drizzle falls, and then I look at Mark that is fumbling with the door-lock and his hair is stripy and wet, and his face has a sheen of moisture, and when I pull him close he heats me up, and his bones feel pointy against me.
Apollyon or Apollo – To the Greeks, he was a well-loved god arguably most famous for the interpretation of his prophecies by the Sybils of Delphi. It is highly significant that John specified the Greek god Apollo as the same entity who will also bring widespread fear, terror, pain and destruction. If little else, does this admission in the Revelations indicate how interconnected through shared mythology all of these religions really are? What we can surmise is that the newly made religions of Judaism and its offshoots rewarded at least one Greek god the status of an incredibly powerful angel or demon and claimed it to be the same entity which held a similar position within their doctrine. Also note that this is the only god who kept the same name in the transference from Greek to Roman gods… both call him Apollo.
*1500 Calories
20"deep without leaves raised
“What the fuck's this all about then?”
You can sew together any motif that fits closely to the next . The effect you get when sewing together motifs is much more solid than the Join as you go method.
This from a guy who moved 25,000 jobs overseas (and is the go-to-guy on jobs for Obama.)
Entrance Exam consist of?'
Quite who it’s aimed at, I’m not sure – I suspect young children will find some of the story a bit dull and not get many of the jokes, while adults may find the whole thing a bit too sweet and precious and silly for their tastes. I imagine it will probably do very well with a certain type of teenage girl.
That sorrow took on a whole new meaning when in 2005 my second son went from the arms of my husband, his earthly father straight into the arms of his Heavenly Father. Mother's Day was doubly hard as a daughter missing her mom, AND as a mom missing her son. Mother's Day seemed like a day simply to exploit the brokenness in my life. Losing Asher in 2008 only compounded the pain.
November 1
Brasserie De L'Abbey DU Val-Dieu: 2.98 Mugs
Then there is me.
When sometime lofty towers I see down-raz’d,
While I think that the music industry is making good strides toward stopping piracy, I don’t really think that they’re ever going to be able to stop it or even contain it. Today, there are so many different websites where you can download your music and probably more being made everyday. I don’t think that these additional warning are really going to make that big of an impact. They need to find a way to completely stop downloading or just stop with warnings and start fining people like they did with the woman I mentioned earlier. Of course, I hope they don’t actually start doing that, but I think that’s the only way people would start to take downloading consequences seriously.
I really liked how Bugs was able to create the world he inhabited…and that he could make it work the way he wanted it to. That seemed to be a superpower.
You may remember I showed you a sweet Strawberry Tea Set that my friend, Anne Marie, gifted to me which made me realize that I had a lot of Strawberry items in my Kitchen.
There you have it. Hope you like the schedule I've finally come up with. I'm looking forward to celebrating all that's YA with our new YATT badge. I can't wait to see what you all come up with!
¤ Do You want to eliminate stress?
Now, when it’s my turn he jumps
Unable to refute his arguments, I wish him good luck and bid him a fond farewell. On the way back, I spot a couple of hungry students foraging in the snow for dead rodents. It being Christmas, I invite them home for a bowl of broth and a shampoo. They accept my offer eagerly and walk behind me as a gesture of respect. I tell them to maintain a distance of ten feet and keep their hands in their pockets.
As you might try a jewel in your hair.
It would be great to have as many members as we can attend the show and
Ask about camp, and you'll hear so many stories of fun, and learning, and growth, and healing, and inside jokes, and new talents, and old friends, you'll really wish that you had been there with me, just to experience that.
It’s a dark abyss or tunnel:
Still, trying to catch up on myself! So here is another thoughtful & prayerful project and I managed not to colour an image on this one too! LOL. Don't worry, my Promarkers aren't being made redundant. LOL. Instead I went for shape & die cuts - as well as the sentiment needless to say, to convey my message.
Place in a large saucepan stalk side down, with several cm of water, (add a little salt and sugar) and boil for 25 - 45 minutes depending on the size. (Mine were done in 30min)
See, she’s about to meet the rest of the gang, and he’s worried about how they’d react. As Barney’s bro, Ted takes an oath that he won’t reveal either this or how she’s tricked Barney in the past. Bro + oath = “broath”.
I hope everyone is doing well. I'm probably going to be quiet for the rest of this week--I've come down with strep and I'm trying to recoup before GenCon in a few days!
Of course, republicans in Canada (yes, we've got a few here, too) also cite the end of The Queen's reign as the time when they think Canadians will all of a sudden wake up and magically become republicans. Their thinking is flawed.
Pack punch into a few details. Instead of giving the history of the place and how long the character has been there and what the weather’s like, consider something like this:
All lies and betrayals … Laid to rest .. Amen .. Good riddance ..
I bought Power by Bertrand Russell after reading The Conquest of Happiness several months ago. I keep opening it and closing it, wondering when the right time to read it will finally come along.
Last night I went to walk the dog. My oldest said wait, he'd come along - he wanted to get some pictures of the stars. He'd been reading up on how to photograph starlight. Fifteen years old.
Kids seem to follow pictures better than words.
Happy New Year to all of you out there who still read my sporadic blog. I promise I will actually do a Christmas day post within the next week. There has been a lot going on here, about which I'll also try to write a blog in the next week. I have one exciting piece of news that I will share after Monday.
Last week, my husband had to spend a morning in Lunenburg for work. I gladly went along. Lunenburg is a UNESCO world heritage site due to its striking architecture, and a Mecca for a history geek like me.
From Lubeck, 1463, St. Mary’s Church in Lubeck, Germany, by artist Bernt Notke.
“This.” Addison giggled as she raised one of her hands, a golden necklace chain wrapped around her wrist. “Do you like it?” An evil giggle escaped Addison’s lips as her eyes locked onto Christian’s. “It’s an antique.”
If Jim wanted to be more proactive, then this seemed like a way to do that while still keeping things light and fun and voluntary for the kids. It's also been a great way for him to feel connected to our unschooling and to the kids while at work.
In 2005, the Olin Foundation actually declared “mission accomplished” and closed up shop. The New York Times reported that after “three decades financing the intellectual rise of the right,” the foundation’s services were no longer needed. The Times added that the loss of Olin wasn’t terribly troubling for the movement, because whereas “a generation ago just three or four major foundations operated on the Right, today’s conservatism has no shortage of institutions, donors or brio.”
I would like to thank Arab Writer Chick for nominating me for this award. I greatly enjoy your writings and always come away feeling inspired. I highly recommend her blog!
Me: It’s very sweet.
1 spanish onion, diced
Crime Fiction Space Jumps
I kept telling myself that i knew i could win,
Remember too that the one-third salary increase need not be – indeed should not be – across the board.
And then the passion fruit ceviche appeared and I ascended into heaven. Delicate pieces of sea bass were cured in a passion fruit and lime potion for a zesty yet sweet taste that I can only describe as other worldly. It really doesn't get much better than that. Then I glanced at the paper that held the chips.
Tangled (2010), written by Dan Fogelman and directed by Nathan Greno and Bryan Howard, is Disney's 50th animated feature, and while the formulaic Disney elements are ever-present—cute animal sidekicks, buffoonish comic relief, a central love story—there's a refreshing sincerity that transcends the familiar outlines of this beautifully imagined world.
of a twig under a boot. Trap
I'm still sore from Sunday. My quads and hamstrings. Normal aches. My knee feels fine now (still concerns me). My hips ache when I sit properly at my desk and while driving, but...that's normal at this point.
Recently woman’s monthly magazine Company has seen a significant decline in sales which has meant they are attracting fewer advertisers. However, this doesn’t seem to have disheartened the team behind it.
“So the way things are consumed is very different. At this conference I’ve listened to a lot of conversations about streaming and how it would work, but it’s completely the other end of the spectrum in India, and I know it’s the same in China as well.”
As well, Kon Ichikawa's extraordinary The Makioka Sisters (1983), which Criterion has also released on DVD this summer, explores the conflicts between the traditions of the past and the modern world encroaching on those traditions. But Ichikawa, whose movies (Kagi, Fires on the Plain, The Burmese Harp) often ride on waves of inchoate emotions moving towards a sense of discovery, addresses those changes with evocative colourful impressions rather than through familiar narrative devices. While the film is based on a Junichiro Tanizaki novel (as was Kagi), The Makioka Sisters departs from some of the plot designs of the book and creates instead an evocation of a way of life that reveals the fleeting impermanence of beauty. It may be one of the few pictures where colour reveals as much about the dramatic moods as does the plot.
Our older guide told me a few days ago that there are 20,000 Buddhists in the country and 20,000 Catholic Christians. The two figures seem a bit neatly similar.
Whatever we sent to the universe, comes back to us – that was another great point of their dialogue. If you are a complainer, you will find things to complaine about. If you are grateful and thank instead, you will have and be given more things to thank for.
Our second B2B2B is Mon-Tues-Wed. all on the road against Golden St., the Lakers, and Sacramento. All eyes are on you, Pop! I expect minimal minutes out of Tony, Manu, & Tim for the first one.
Our Quiz Party was devised and made successful by the legendary Jeremy Beadle. We’re so grateful to Chris Tarrant for continuing to maintain the success of this unique evening.
But I, I’ve gotta slow it right down
The man was walking out the sliding glass door leading to the patio. He pulled the brass handle to
My hubby is gone to Ottawa for work this week so I am left to my own devices. You would think I might be more productive with the house to myself. But I am not. I just avoid everything I need to do. I come from work, get my work out and then curl up in my bed, catch up on my PVR (Personal Video Recorder) and blog. Completely avoiding any house productivity. I think I can largely blame the PVR for that. It is a great device but a dangerous device. How easily can you get trapped, recording everything. Then what happens... you get interested in more shows, new shows, cooking shows. Until the warm weather comes back I am allowed to do this.
The headline numbers for this survey increased slightly from last week. The average market exposure inched higher to 29% from 26%. But what I want to bring to your attention more than that is the difference between the most bullish responders to the poll and the most bearish. This ‘Polarity’ is now declining rapidly after reaching a new record in late April:
The Cayman Islands Film Commission (CIFC) was established in January 2009 to promote and develop a local film industry. As a government agency, it promotes the Cayman Islands as a prime location for film, television, music video, and advertising productions, and facilitates these productions with every aspect of production from development and pre-production through post-production.
Yes, I’m happy.
renounce this whole world and
However, the rector also admitted that complaints were made by some faculty members of the Arabic department against him to the Saudi embassy, which were then forwarded to the presidency.
We are serving it in a snifter to keep in all the yummy flavor and aroma. This beer was not filtered and has a slight haze at cold temperatures. If let to warm up a bit the haze fades and all the juicy malt aroma comes to the front.
Some forum posters report that GMs are saying that F2P accounts were never supposed to be able to lock their XP, and that this is the intended behavior. We may see some clarification on this in the next few days, but if you have locked a F2P account below level 20, you might want to watch your XP bar very carefully.
Today I am also playing along with the following challeges:
Or put my face on a billboard for you to notice my signs
Playing a game session at the Baranof was crazy enough. It's a glorious dive that positively oozes history. All you have to do is mentally replace the flat screen tv with an ancient b&w model and it's uncanny how easily you can picture Charles Bukowski perched on the barstool at the end.
So that's when I walked back into the main room where all my fellow Spring Breakers were hanging out. I told them "yeah, I just got off the phone w/my Dad. I told him about my mad cocking skills."
Mr. Young is asked how he gets on with Mr. Mugabe.
I even started to consider . . . . . . "the chair".
...I am eating rice every day. I am watching the television every day.
Weiner Dogs Rule!
Be sure to tune in next week for numbers 1 & 2 in my list of Top 4 Displays of Klutziness.
and sometimes
Somewhere on the highway between Illinois (silent ‘s’) and Oklahoma, yours truly began developing a headache. These events are rare enough for me that at the first available pee break, I dug through the dense cargo hold of the Blazer and located some Motrin. All was well for the next few hundred miles. The girls were being teenage females, and after the entirety of the trip thus far, boredom reigned supreme in the back seat. Arguments over the CD player, the CD’s, the pens, the paper, and which line of stitches in the seat marked territory blended into a dull roar. Di and I were numb to this and just rode in sullen, boiling silence. The knot at the base of my melon seemed to be subsiding, and Di offered to drive to let me attempt a recuperative nap.
For more info on Tim's March, 2012, tag challenge ... or to check out Tim's tag and step-by-step tutorial, clicky HERE ... the other challenge info can be found below.
“Consider it pure joy, my brothers, whenever you face trials of many kinds, because you know that the testing of your faith develops perseverance.” James 1:2-3
I had sat at my desk with the intentions of using the Australian Sporting flag with the boxing kangaroo but these wonderful red and white Bazzill patterned papers (Worth Remembering) from Blue Edge Crafts were just calling me. I have also used the Linen Textured cardstock from Blue Edge crafts. Amazingly found just the right flowers in my collection and added the bling centres to them from Pizzazz Aplenty. Finished the card off with a wonderful white sentiment sticker from the Sticker Store who happen to be our sponsor for this challenge. Terrific prize of $50.00 worth of stickers. So drag out all your papercrafts and start creating. Just remember no stamps (rubber or digital) for these challenges.
Zhang RL, Zeng JS, Zhang HZ. Survey of 34 pregnant women with hepatitis A and their neonates. Chin Med J 1990; 103: 552-555.
I’ll recommend more books next month.
Londo and I have never minded having the kids (and dog and cat) in our bed. It's the main reason we got a king-sized bed. But the rule is that anyone in our bed has to let the others sleep. The Pookie is still learning that rule.
There are little bright blue wildflowers blooming at the bottom of the hill around the tv satellite dishes. A small patch of one of them bloomed there in May of 2008. I've been trying to identify them ever since. They aren't in any of my many wildflower books. I even posted a What Is This? entry here on the blog. Never got an answer.
Dega: I wasn't going to tell you guys, but I had a dream that Richie put me and Ponder in a muffin making contest.
½ cup of almonds and ½ cup of raisins
22But the men who were sent saw that they were not in the prison, and came back with the news,
You burn more calories sleeping than you do watching television.
I made two, decided to trash one and the one that I kept is yet to be finished. We ran out of time, which is understandable with such a big group of people, there were 20,of us.
Protest action in and around Frank Ogawa Plaza in downtown Oakland. These photos are out of order because I wanted to show some of the more peaceful things that went on first as well as the clashes with police.
Kidman really does a great job at capturing Grace’s tight, strict demeanor and devotion to the Lord, which pretty much frame her entire character. She is quite vividly colored and I actually found myself totally drawn into the performance, believing every inch of it. The kids, same thing, they are excellent. Bertha Mills is one of the better characters, and Fionnula Finnegan really makes you question her motives at every turn – you know there’s something up with her, but what is it? Or are you just being paranoid? Her companions are a young mute girl and an elderly man, neither of whom have many lines, but both end up as sufficiently creepy and suspicious anyway.
To make matters worse, his writings are at times neither unclear nor straightforward. Below is a snapshot of chapter 14, characterized by a string of numbers, Qs and 17 pages of words. It was through some guesswork that I fathom the numbers to represent the social security IDs of IRS employees and the Qs represent interview questions that were never explicitly articulated.
If the statistical model is capturing something real, then these transformations should marginally improve the odds that Laos will transition to democracy. Of course, the observed “effect” is probabilistic, not deterministic, so I’m not suggesting that Laos will start holding free elections as soon as it joins.
5. i haven't felt like dancing or doing art in months.
First of all I finally decided on the room – my kitchen. Yes, all five of us crammed into my small kitchen. I pulled out the medium-sized table, cleared off the top, positioned five chairs around the table, made coffee, had fresh strawberries, muffins and cookies available. I cleared off the top of the radiator and put memoir books I planned to use on the radiator. We did go into my office (next door to the kitchen) for part of Session 2, to do research online on my desktop computer, but that was already planned.
The best contributions from each region will be compiled and broadcast during the World Day to Combat Desertification, which will take place in Rio on 17 June. They will also be featured prominently on the UNCCD Rio+20 website prior to that date.
Panetta’s reported view has been echoed in recent interviews by NBC News with current and former U.S. and Israeli officials who have access to their countries’ intelligence. Those officials, all of whom spoke to NBC News on background, estimated the odds of an Israeli attack on Iran as better than 50-50....
I am currently on Day 6 of the recipe. So just a quick stire today. At present it is looking something like the above.
of rapidity largely occupied
break more hearts,
party tonight on a mid summer night
With their other picks, the Eagles took Nick Foles (QB, 88), Dennis Kelly (OT, 153), Marvin McNutt (WR, 194), Brandon Washington (OG, 200) and Bryce Brown (RB, 229.) Foles is a project. Don’t expect him to see the field for a few years unless there’s multiple injuries to the team’s other QB’s. Kelly and Washington give you some depth on the offensive line. McNutt could challenge Riley Cooper for a roster spot as the team’s token tall receiver. Of all the offensive players the Eagles took in the draft, Bryce Brown has the best chance to produce right away. LeSean McCoy is probably the best player on the team and will be the workhorse for the running game, but Brown is bigger than McCoy and Deion Lewis so he could see big plays in short yardage.
"Nah, sounds like she wants a second date."
She goes on to tell her young audience about the importance of living your dream, of life being short and it being important to do what you love. But in the same breath, she talks about the rejections.
History has shown that the Leave it to Beaver ideal is not the one that will satisfy. There is no man on the face of this earth who can completely fulfill the desire of a woman’s heart. Being a wife and a mom is a great calling and privilege, but it doesn’t satisfy our deepest needs.
The campaign also includes a stunning website, NeverStopNeverSettle.com, an immersive online journey through the world of Hennessy through a rabbit hole of sorts. Fans can learn about the motivations of these famous people, as well as share their own white rabbits and get access to Hennessy events.
Next, stamping in white.
Tony Mack - Robert Pugh
i hope his threes prove to be just as much fun.
As you’ll see below in the second video, it contained songs that prompted drummers everywhere to take on some of the more difficult drum parts. The ones with the more challenging, “polyrhythmic” flair.
It is cold and damp tonight and since it is Sunday and everything closes early that is not fun. The positive was that they changed the original forecast from an ice storm to just rain. At least I have that. I am so tired again today. But it is just boredom that makes me so tired. I don't have the money to go anywhere.
For this project I set out colored beans, froot loops and noodles. I told the kids to draw a picture and then trace it with glue. Then they covered the glue with the beans, cereal and noodles.
The only downside of the experience was the door that no one seemed to understand should be shut after going through it. The weather now is getting cooler and nobody likes to sit in a draught.
Thank you all for sharing these wonderful cards with us!
Skeeter: Yep, Claire. She had the softest cock gums and her ass was fine like a Dusty Rhodes elbow.
Sent Me This Cute Sewing Themed 2 x 2 Mini Canvas Board/Magnet!
3) Jesus’s death caused the disciples to despair and lose hope;
Perfect for deriding anyone’s sartorial choices, or just choices or opinions full stop.
Thus went perhaps the strangest quote I overheard during my quick jaunt around City Screen’s new East London venture, Hackney Picturehouse, which threw open its doors earlier today for a special open day for Founder Members. Hackney Picturehouse is, of course, ‘a bit new’ because it is, of course, a bit new.
My Generation
The young people who are coming back to the Church are not interested in fighting the battles of their parents’ generation, instead they are deeply curious about the faith, he said.
brown 1 pound of ground beef (drain the fat)
I have torn open the veil.
According to Holland, players who were here two years ago, when Dennis Wolff was fired, noticed an immediate change as soon as Chambers came in.
great Sachem of the Wampanoag, knew these facts, yet he and his People welcomed and befriended the settlers of the Plymouth Plantation. Perhaps he did this because his Tribe had been depleted by an epidemic. Or his knowledge of the harsh oncoming winter was the reason for his peaceful acceptance of these acts. This action by Massasoit was perhaps our biggest mistake. We, the Wampanoag, welcomed you, the white man, with open arms, little knowing that it was the beginning of the end; that before 50 years were to pass, the Wampanoag would no longer be a free people.
in all seriousness brooklyn, thanks for those selections. they gave me some laughs and, more importantly, they raised some questions for me that i didn't expect and i always appreciate that.
ὥστε εἴ τις ἐν Χριστῷ, καινὴ κτίσις· τὰ ἀρχαῖα παρῆλθεν, ἰδοὺ γέγονεν καινά·
Small chocolate drops for eyes
Tanaka Farms doesn't have an orchard so they supplement the box with organic oranges and apples from Cuyama Orchards in Ventura County.
I scrutinized Mr D carefully. There was something very different about him. Dressed in his usual Korean boy-band style (shaggy hair, thick-framed glasses, fitted jeans and boots), everything looked misplaced on his body. It was as if he’d stayed over at a friend’s house after a drunken late night, and had to borrow the bigger man’s clothing. His eyes, once bright and sharp, were now glassy, alien features on his painfully gaunt face.
DGS and DGD stayed over last night. We had a busy time: walking the dog, bike riding, jumping on the trampoline, cooking and eating, playing Candyland, reading books, having a sauna, playing in the sandbox and just plain old playing.
Specifically, the Mayor would be required to notify the Council at two points in time— first, the Council would be notified of the initial request for a cost increase; and additionally, once the project extension or modification has taken place, the Council would be notified of any additional contract extensions or modifications that result in a 10% cost increase above the revised contract value.
Living in Australia has challenged me in different ways than Europe did, and I will be coming back with yet again a changed worldview (There’s no language barrier, but don’t let that fool you). I feel stronger than ever and I feel confident imparting a little wisdom to other young, eager, and hopeful travelers.
I had a long chat with Dean Skoreyko today on the phone. I’m not sure if you’re aware, but in the bazaro days that were the BC Conservative Party in 2009/2010 Dean had a spat with some then board members…
By having a car crash, your resentment and anger towards other people will be suddenly tempered by self-blame. The self-blame will balance your anger towards others while also increasing your level of guilt. You will feel guilty because, of course, this is going to cost money and affect your insurance. And, also, you've just bashed into someone else's car.
Last year, roadblocks were mounted even before the rally started. Police said the move was to prevent weapons from being smuggled into the city (which appeared to have been justified when explosives and knives were found leading up to the Bersih 2.0 rally.
Maybe a lifetime worth of a journey
A3 Times Square Preachers - A Question Of Control
As I walked in the door there was a notice board with information on a few new events and activities happening at the library over the next few weeks. One of these was a Jewellery Making course – perfect, fun, creative and different, exactly the kind of thing I had been looking for and best of all, enrolment was taking place that very day. Of course I had to find out more…
The Greek word Jesus uses is tetelestai. We see the word appear only two times in the entire New Testament- one in John 19:28 and one in John 19:30. In John 19:28 we read that “everything had been fulfilled / accomplished / completed.” Or, everything had been “tetelestai.” Then, before He offered His spirit to the Father, Jesus asked for a drink (John 19:28). It seems He did this so He would be able to speak boldly without a parched, cracked speech.
*We need to be building a repertoire of skills that will translate. We need to know how to transfer the patterns of spelling. Spelling needs to be learned in the act of writing.
But are not the white dragons part of the overall dragon family?
Man: Admittedly a few birds did act strange….
Level 12: Mastery: +61%, Weapon ATT: +12, Minimum Critical Damage: +6%.
My Thoughts: I remember learning about the Titanic in 2nd grade and thinking that it was an incredibly interesting event in history. When the movie came along it just reinforced my interest in the topic. Yes, I was one of those crazy teenagers who saw the movie multiple times in the theatre but I also watched an excessive amount of documentaries and read whatever I could get my hands on about the disaster. Somehow I missed A Night to Remember. It was really neat to read something that was written when there were still a lot of survivors still alive and were able to participate in the writing of the book. I am much more interested in the human aspect of the Titanic story than the more technical side so I really enjoyed how much information the book provided about individuals experiences on the ship.
We are open every Sunday from 12-4. So plan to join us for a fun afternoon. We have beautiful sock yarn to choose from and if you need needles, we have those too!
Isn’t modern technology wonderful?
14. Heavy metal group Manowar would not have been half as cool without Orson's voice.
It amused me that the author (played by James Caan) in Stephen King’s Misery had a ritual he followed: He celebrated alone in his room (whether in a hotel room or at home) by treating himself to a cigarette and a glass of fine wine. That scene triggered my curiosity, but it wasn’t until people persisted in asking me that question that I decided to write a blog about it. So I put the question to some popular authors and I think their answers will interest you. I’ll share their celebratory ways before divulging my own. (Age usually comes before beauty, the old saying goes, but in this case, I’ll reverse the process.)
Ms Ho said Lee had no reason to suspect that she was younger than her stated age on the website. She said when Lee met the girl, she told him she was 19 years old.
How do you take care of your antique arm chair, then? This article contains a few guidelines which you can follow.
Frank Lampard
Neither the bullies who shout nor the bullies who enforce.
I took a peek over at Linda but she seemed absorbed in the Toronto Star's crossword puzzle.
Is just a concept.
Updates from subsequent visits:
c) Omniscient: Tom chased the beer wagon while the villagers watched and wondered, Would all the beer in the world be enough for this oaf?
Much of it, though, is a deliberate effort to hide the truth. From the Pentagon’s photo policy to agribusiness now championing so-called “ag gag” laws to punish activists who expose factory farm atrocities, vested interests are exploiting the fact that “out of sight, out of mind” is a default setting in the human mind. More here.
Addiction, depression, eating disorders… for some of you, one or more of those words will stand out, screaming at you from the screen. You know more about that word than you have let the world know – you know it inside out. It’s your secret.
and so your soul
Answer: Food, hygiene products, roof over our heads, clothes on our backs, internet connection, electric, and coffee.
Maximize each minute
But the activists not only misunderstand the extended culture of African society, the destruction of the African family by colonialism, and the high rate of abuse, especially in lands which have been affected by civil wars......hint: it's not your hairdresser or the gay bar down the street they are worried about...check UKGuardian report.
Some choice bits from Fund’s NRO column:
I hope life treats you kind
I think we are all caught up. But there is a new episode tomorrow. Who knows what is going to happen? A beer review? Some pictures from Beerfest? More about my addition to Netflix? Who knows. But I'll tell you this, It sure feels good to be back!
So, to all, no credit check payday cash advances are right away approved properly soon after a little bit of your individual verification. The money amount is in electronic format utilized in your account. You will get Funds inside round the clock, Nevertheless now and again in a few minutes way too. The increased amount is often in the cover anything from &pound100-&pound1500. You settle The money amount up until the duration of the following pay check. Once, it will be easy to meet up with your speedy requires.
Of pure ablution round earth’s human shores,
2And I saw as it were a sea of glass mingled with fire: and them that had gotten the victory over the beast, and over his image, and over his mark, and over the number of his name, stand on the sea of glass, having the harps of God.
And I have to say, I’m pretty disappointed. Dead in the Family is no where near on par with the other nine novels in the series. I know they’re just fun reads, but that should make it all the more easy to keep the level of quality consistent. I’ve come to admire Harris for her plots and characters. Not necessarily her writing style and skill. She has this way of weaving intricate plots with dynamic characters that keep you hooked. However, this book lacked both.
Every mother a Farrah Fawcett.
Other Items
her skin
ungiven
The former speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich.
We all lug books (or at least our e-readers) on vacation. But sometimes the most exciting book discoveries come while we're on vacation and either find a new book or author, rediscover an old favourite, or have someone recommend a book. I first read The Stand at the age of 13 because my uncle happened to have it lying around.
Typically people self publish without any understanding of what it really takes to make a book salable. I'm certainly no expert. But I'm learning new things every day and between reader feedback and possibly the help of an editor or two I plan on making my book as good as it possibly can be before either self publishing it or seriously seeking out traditional publishing.
I don’t know….those are my thoughts for the day.
The researchers use a machine called an accelerator mass spectrometer to measure the amount of radioactive carbon remaining in a sample. The machine works in a manner analogous to what happens when a beam of white light passes through a prism: White light separates into the colors of the rainbow.
I made this card about 2 weeks ago (but I only got it in the mail yesterday...) for a friends daughter who received an academic award in her school - only one is handed out per school so it is a pretty big deal. I used one of my Mo Manning digi stamps for the image and coloured in to match the Basic Gray paper I chose...She is going in to grade 9 so this image was perfect for her age. I used one of my Bella sentiments on the front and inside I used my printer and added "you're the Best!"
to learn to recognize and focus on the positive in each moment,
myself, or read my book, or jolt awake.
An excellent profile of the operating parameters, equipment, personnel, and funding of all the U.S. weapons production facilities.
I did add to my Hugelkultur bed today, already laying down the brush, limbs, greens, scrap from the yard, moved some logs on top, getting ready to harvest some moss, then last the topsoil and planting. This is a work in progress that I will share as it evolves.
Amount Requested $35,000
When I left New York the skies were grey and the threat of rain lingered. I pointed in the direction of Baltimore and began pedaling, pedaling hard. My cousin Jason had offered to let me stay with him and his family in Baltimore. I had planned on making this a two day trip but the combination of bad weather and solid suburbia between New York and Baltimore convinced me to try to make it one shot.
Turns out the three thugs who murdered him all are part of some weird neighborhood protection racket, which I think involved some kind of rigged lottery (?), that is being run by some crooked cops with assistance from a crooked local comic book store owner named Andre. So it’s no surprise that Darren wants revenge – in fact, he’s about to pull the trigger on one of the men responsible when Reese intervenes. Reese knows all about the pitfalls of revenge, and he spends the episode schooling Darren on how to get even without taking lives, but kicking loads upon loads of ass.
1. love & hate minutiae: i love when it's raining and you go under a bridge and it's suddenly really quiet for just a split second before you drive back into the pouring rain...i love that quiet part. i hate when health foods/products companies use the phrase "it's a totally organic experience" in their slogans.
Here is how you could help support and make Operation Shower an even greater success!
Ink: Blackbird, Deep Lagoon and Creamy Brown Fluid Chalk inks by Clearsnap
It was a lovely wedding. The wedding itself was held at the bride and groom's church...a beautiful venue, beautiful saints...but I gotta say...
"The future you see there has all come about
How when ruby was finally placed in our arms, she screamed and kicked and wanted nothing to do with us, but then 24 hours later she was calling us 'mommy' and 'daddy'--it's true.
Slogans appeared on lecture-room blackboards and one such work read, “Reactionary teachers, we will have your skin for shoes for the poor”! At the height of militancy, contemporary insiders put the number of core Naxals in the college at no more than 30 — not a big figure, but by most accounts the single largest Maoist presence among all DU institutions. In 1968, history student Arvind Narain Das had run for president of the college student’s body elections on an openly Naxal platform. He won. “We were ready to storm heaven,” Dilip Simeon, a leading member of the group, was to write later. During 1970, their activities started to enter a serious phase.
This is one more reason we have to get rid of this Barry Soetoro in November!! We must Wake up AMERICA! Stop Marxism or bend down to Dictators like Barry does.
“We ain’t exactly Wonderland, Jimmy.”
needs repair such as cracks, holes, or separated joints, you might not
Hello everyone!!!. Today's card is dedicated to Christopher. He has been our Sunday School teacher for many many years. Now since he has a lot of work with the Youth and Preaching in our Church, we (Diane, his wife Ann and myself) decided to take care of the Sunday School to help him. I made this card for his farewell this coming Sunday. I know it is hard for him to stop teaching the little ones but he is going to still work hard for God preaching His word and he still be an example for the kids. Here is his card:
By now, others from the tribe have been aroused from afternoon slumber as the hiss of teleporters and swarms of silver-suited humans arouse curiosity as they begin probing the soil, and frown while holding metallic objects in the air. They busy themselves erecting barriers around the now-grounded ‘stars’ prodding antennae into the red soil, establishing what would soon become known as killing sticks to fend off would-be aggressors. Except here, there are none. Here, there is nothing to fear save fear
Kombucha is pretty tasty and carbonated right off the bat, but fermenting for another 24 hours with some juice, makes it extra yummy.
Watching lights change,
have you in 1961 - Selma had no effect on your birth, as Selma was in 1965.
Today the range of trade jobs has expanded quite a bit with the proliferation of high-tech in medicine, mining, and everywhere else work takes place. All that high-tech gear needs to be set up, operated, and kept in working order. At the same time, there is still opportunity in traditional lower-tech trades, like forestry or landscaping.
Cut, cap and no balance
The First Sunday in Advent
He comes to his mother's and father's bedroom, and floats in over them. His father is a big mound under the blanket, with his head sticking out at the top. His mother is a medium-sized mound, but where her head should be there's nothing but pillow—she's put the pillow over her head to help herself go to sleep.
This weekend I thought it would be great to tackle the refrigerator. Honestly, I don't remember the last time mine got a thorough cleaning and I was amazed at the amount of grime inside! And this is where I store my food!
Cherry Lucy est assise sur le banc Spring Bench d'une ancienne collection, les cerises qui pendent au coin de l'image ont été faites avec la nouvelle découpe cerise CC Cutter Cherry Die puis coloriées au Copic. Le sentiment vient du set Berry Logos.
Yes and I really like them :)
Grind flax into coarse powder.
All the critters on that particular slope some months ago had dug-up themselves a leader – the desert squirrel, Yahtzee. Yahtzee declared peace & nobody ate anybody else anymore & low n’ behold, manna had been falling from the crystalline sky ever since.
All joking apart, by this point, I was quite seriously exhausted both mentally and physically; the reasons for this were many but essentially fall into 3 categories which apply to all forms of cycling:
studio's possibilities for sound-sculpting. Surprisingly, given
When my boys are on school vacation it’s a lot harder to fit writing in. The only time I have then is after they go to bed, but I’ll be lucky to manage a full hour before I’m too tired. Sometimes I try and view their school vacations as my own imposed holiday – I know it’s good to get some space and reboot, even though I wouldn’t always choose to. Having the time while they’re at school is a luxury, I know, and I’m very lucky.
I want to share this with as many people as possible, so if you're interested I'll email you the file.
If interested comment here and I will provide you with the coupon code to purchase the book at no charge :)
Hang my head in shame and slowly trudge into the gas station to inquire about borrowing a phone.
Check out OP's new web page.
ARTIST: Down By Law
I thought I would have another go.
Neither of them moved.
We are also having some surprises and giveaways for all the attendees!
I think this was because few people had heard of it and had wanted more info on it.
But, I chanced upon this video a few weeks back.
I have loved the words of Erma Bombeck ever since I was just a kid. I was probably 12 when I first discovered her wit and wisdom. She always had such unique views on motherhood and life in general; the kind of things that make you go "Hmmmmmmm...she's right! Why didn't I think of that?"
We stayed out for a couple hours and, as we headed back, the setting sun broke through the clouds turning the whole valley golden behind us. A parting gift from the weather gods.
Hitters and the Chichi music
Wanna see my process?
American readers, especially, will note that the very middle or central portion of what today is the National Maritime Museum in Greenwich Park is, in fact, the blueprint design for The White House in Washington.
Lieber backed Schick up, saying that there’s been no discussion of the issue, to his knowledge.
in red-hot iron shoes.
First layer: yellow squash first. Use about 1/2 of the yellow slices in the first layer. Sprinkle squash with about 1/4 t kosher salt, some black pepper and a light dusting of garlic and onion powder. Next layer 1/4 of the shredded cheeses on top of the seasoned squash slices.
On Thursday March 24th we launched the fifth anthology of poetry by participants in writing workshops funded and run by English PEN. It was an electrifying evening of work by participants from all over the world.
* Within city limits
May the luck of the Irish enfold you.
DH: “Mmm. So who comes to the show?”
Refried Bean Enchiladas
Austria asks Serbia who it's looking at.
You can imagine the rest of the day from there. It was an awesome, awesome time and I am SO happy to relive the memory now that Scott F. has found me online!
So I’m coming up with a plan of attack this summer. This is what I have so far:
Just when it could safely be assumed that every rivet of the Titanic had been examined, every myth exhausted and every survivor story told, chance has thrown up a rich hoard of new material written by two of the most vilified first-class passengers to escape drowning.
This list is not exhaustive, it’s just to give you an idea of the kinds of things you should be looking for. A lot of it is the attitude. You are looking for a woman who does not shift blame onto you, who takes responsibility when she is wrong, who argues using logic and evidence, who loses arguments gracefully, and wins arguments gracefully, and who loves you and cares for you even if you are fighting. If the woman is resentful and doesn’t want to learn anything to deepen her faith, then drop her and find someone who will learn – it will be much better for you to partner with someone lovable and helpful, instead of a selfish lazy feminist.
I liked the intro to the show with James Franco and Anne Hathaway visiting the nominated movies in the good old Inception stylee
10I am disgusting to them; they keep away from me, and put marks of shame on me.
The lines to check-out were endless, streaming into jewelry and inappropriate tween wear. I wove my cart through the herd and settled into Lane 8, which only had three shoppers in front of me. However, Lane 6 only had one shopper! And she was already checking out! Oh, joyful, speedy day!
I had my first massage when I was 35. The thought of having someone put their hands on me when I had no control made me feel way too uncomfortable. But being pregnant and having awful sciatica, I decided to give it a go and anyway some very good friends bought me a pre-natal massage. I remember feeling really nervous about it, I walked into the most gorgeous little tucked away Day Spa and filled out my forms. They directed me to the lounge for my cucumber water or tea and "Jamie" came to greet me. She took me to this dark little room which smelt like lavender and had calming music playing into the room.
Do I realize my blessings? You can bet your last hug with your significant other, or that sweet baby, or even the hug from a dear friend, I sure do!!
It was plain to see that your life was lost
NO PLAN FOR EXISTING PLANTS
Gritting his teeth for the charge he knows will follow, he focuses the energies around him into a glowing orb in his mind, and forces it into being above the creature. He lowers it, the invisible sphere surrounding it totally, completely.
Outstanding trait: Jesus called James and John “Sons of Thunder” – Ambitious, judgmental – Later: very loving
Merry Christmas, whatever you're drinking.
I call this picture “Palmolivia.” It is fascinating because I had no idea that the original formula of Palmolive came in three distinctly different colors. Who knew?
Why don't YOU have any sales proudly displayed on YOUR site? Don't you have any? To real publishers, that is, not vanity houses.
Disgruntled from constant soakings. Fed up with being wet. Tired of looking at, listening to rain, it was pure joy (and some disbelief) to open my eyes to brilliant sunshine this morning.
We have 24 hours or 1,440 minutes or 86,4000 seconds in a day. When you think in terms of 30 minute blocks of time, it seems like we must waste so much time throughout the day, right? I mean, if you sleep 8 hours a night then that leaves you 32 thirty minute blocks throughout the day. That just blew my mind – 32 thirty minute blocks!?!?!?
one broken headband- two pieces
Here is the entire text of the Arizona law (SB 1070). I defy anyone to actually cite a passage that is racist, or which actively endorses any racist policy.
The prix fixe menu:
So two of us had crepes, and Derema, whose one-hand-issue makes crepes a pain, had fish tacos. The two of them kept trying to encourage me to take a bite, but they smelled FOUL. I like fish, but most cheap Mexican food is repulsive. I don’t even do Taco Bell anymore.
And if he’s cruel, miserly, bad-tempered, violent or simply doesn’t suit, she will reject him.
They showed they had talent in Eugene, but Europe loomed large come summer, as success has been a rare commodity for US middle distance runners on the other side of The Pond. But this year has been different. Anna Willard got an 800 win in Paris at 1:58.80. Christin Wurth Thomas ran second in Rome and broke the 4 minute barrier in the 1500 with her 3:59.98 run. And just yesterday Maggie Vessey shocked the 800 field in Monaco with her 1:57.83 victory.
Contrast this with an arts undergrad with whom I used the same case study recently. With a pure arts background, no business experience and only a vaguely remembered economics GCSE to draw on, she was able to make a much better attempt at the problem by sticking to the big picture and using the suggested structure.
Coinciding with the departure of the Vehicle from said House, the party of the first part does hereby assert that he did in fact hear Claus state and/or exclaim:
Her cell phone rang it was her agent Sarah Maples calling, Lisa waved off the make up artist followed by a hard glance; without question she backed away from Lisa with a forced smile exiting the room.
There are limits to our patience, and there are limits to our tolerance. We do not believe in divine promises as a justification for occupation and apartheid. We have left the Middle Ages behind. We laugh uneasily at those who still believe that the god of flora, fauna and the galaxies has selected one people in particular as his favourite and given it silly, stone tablets, burning bushes and a license to kill.
I don't allow myself BREAKS from my food plan. I stay with it, no matter the reason OR the season. Birthdays, holidays, events, celebrations,...or whatever...NO MATTER. FOOD IS FUEL and nothing more! I really don't even desire 'special' foods on these days, but truly desire the solid stable routines I've established. Unfortunately I have ppl in my life that without FOOD celebrations would and do feel LACKING...they don't feel the GREAT way I do b/c they consistently change from no or little sugars to gobs of sugars and so their metabolism is constantly under attack...not so for me...after deciding over 9 mos ago to give up the toxins of over processed sugars or fast metabolizing sugars and starches, I FEEL GREAT! Albeit that right now it's way way to early in the morning for breakfast and b/c I'm awake, my 'guts are growly!' LOL...oh boy, better wrap this up and drift back off to a more acceptable time near my routine. Falling asleep in my recliner has its challenges too.
unique and different,
"Why do you always do that?"
Thank you to everyone who sent their hugs and kind comments yesterday after my sad post about Tilly yesterday - its nice to know that you've given me a little thought in your busy day.
It's that time again this year. I received the invitation bulletin for the Scrapbook at the Bible Camp. I have talked about it several times to my friend, that we need to go. Not just to work on our books, but to "get away". But now that I got the invite, I am having reservations. I do love to scrap but it's quite expensive. And I'm low scale compared to some of the ladies that we met last year. I would bet that they have have spent thousands!!
We’ve learned that phone calls shouldn’t be had when one of the following things are happening: there is a somethingball game on and the apartment is full of girls or children yapping in the background. We’ve also learned that being on time isn’t so difficult to manage but that being 5 minutes late isn’t so terrible either. We’ve also accepted and embraced that sometimes a scientist just doesn’t understand the thoughts of an artist, and an artist sometimes will never know what a scientist is talking about. A little over a year of being that special someone for the other, we still think we’ve got most of it figured out.
42. Witch Laugh - Sounds To Make You Shiver!
but only you can make you ..happy
And embrace my passbook
With that, I encourage those who plan on voting Republican in the fall to make their voices heard and their votes recorded, and go to the caucuses Saturday morning.
It’s how I live.
#18
The only thing I haven't been able to figure out is the ever-so-slight grittiness from the green tea powder, but perhaps that just means that I need to buy a higher quality green tea powder? In any case, I'll continue making this ice cream over and over again, because really, who doesn't love green tea ice cream?
ok i admit i LOVE nailart, i’m ADDICTED TO IT just like Lee Hong Ki xDDD
A staple of Don Draper's wardrobe is the two button wool suit in a charming business gray – lighter than the dusky charcoal typically found in many serge or gabardine wool offerings and a touch darker than the light smoke that became very popular in the 1970's and 1980's. This is an absolute must have item in order to complete the look, CK being just one avenue to pursue in finding a well-tailored equivalent.
I’ve been doing some arty crafty things for a while (making beaded jewellery, doing some wire sculpture and the occasional watercolor) but I’ve been out of the habit a bit.
8.) Johnny Winter - Still Alive And Well - The albino is back with a vengeance.
-madly in love with ex-fiance, still living with him
Instead, lead with value! Let people know you are human and get to know them better. After the initial relationship is built, you want to show these new friends in your network that you care and you are here to help. Instead of trying to sell them on your great biz opp right away, let them know you are there to help them. Whether they join your company or not.
I have been reflecting lately on why certain customs flourish in one religious setting but those same customs utterly fail to produce fruit when transplanted to another. By custom I mean those outward expressions of religious faith common to humankind - certain types of song and musical instruments, manner of prayer, bodily gestures, architectural and artistic creations, and every other expression of culture that usually accompanies religious belief. Religious setting in the broadest sense could mean different religions, but in the context of this discussion, I mean it more with reference to different ecclesial traditions within Christianity itself (Lutheranism, Baptist, Calvinist, and of course, Catholic).
Brown, who gets nothing.
I have to take my colour hit where I can and these pink umbrellas from the food vendors across my soi, are doing it for me.
TLD: How has the media here in UK treated you?
But April’s output literary
Without Jesus we are nowhere. Than we could not be saved and would not have such a marvellous prospect.
This is not to say that everyone’s phone manners deserve reporting to the Courtesy Police, or that in the good old days (when one heavy telephone was hardwired inside a home and “mobile” meant you had an extra long twisty cord attached to it) people never miss-dialed or were always polite; BUT there may be a case to be made that today’s telephone talkers aren’t as smooth as they were in the past (by “past” I mean when I was young and things were better).
And I am your want
It is the set of laws that govern the earth
i'm sorry to wake you from your hibernation so early.
A Parfait! I made this last spring, from this gorgeous fabric I bought in Paris. Like the cotton for my Cod Afrique Hazel dress, this came from Dreyfus in the Marche St Pierre and was only a few euros a metre.
In Cool, Air-conditioned Mountain, there’s a carriage from the 2 torn bridges, 1 abreast the starting point, and 1 abreast the big penguin outside(next to a assurance and red coin). Airing to the bend of the torn bridge, stop for a second, and you will be teleported to the added bridge.
Sports Fan: Uh oh, I’m a UNC Fan! I guess that makes us enemies!
What kind of reader would this story most appeal to, and why?
If you have a previous save file from Mass Effect 2, it can be imported for Mass Effect 3 to take into account your actions and decisions from the first and second game. Game mechanics are the same as Mass Effect 2. Not much has changed except for the addition of being able to roll in and out of cover and a super charged melee attack that is unique to the class you are playing as. Enemies in this game compared to the first two games actually charge to where you are hiding in an attempt to force you out of your protective spot. More mobile enemies that actually seek your Shepard out in a fight makes the combat a bit more challenging. While Mass Effect 2 had the little hacking mini-games you could do in order to loot additional gear or credits for your character, it’s completely gone in the third installment. Planet scanning/probing is part of Mass Effect 3, but maybe not as time consuming as gathering minerals from Mass Effect 2. If you do decide to scan a planet that’s already taken over by the Reapers, don’t expect a leisure find this and take that type of scanning you got from Mass Effect 2. The more you use the scan in Reaper territory, the higher your Reaper detectability will be. Once the Reapers lock onto your presence, you see the Reapers coming for your little Normandy ship on the map and you need to remove yourself from the system before it’s game over and you become Reaper food.
compared with other DVDs in the series, especially in light of how
“Not at all. But he puts his money away and doesn’t appear to have any
I'd be happy to run in this way for long periods, since the IC718 is really a re-badged IC-78 which is sold as a rugged HF radio to Commercial users.
Around 2007, things changed. I started to figure out for myself what artists I liked superlatively, and followed them through leaks and by downloading their back catalogs. At first, I did the responsible thing: if I liked the album and played it enough, I’d go out and buy it. By the end of 2007, my collection got so multifarious and large that this became infeasible.
The world sells us comfort in exchange for our faith. Comfort subtly kills. Standing still is not a neutral position, it’s a choice and a consequence of that choice is stagnation. There is always “Selah” times in life but sometimes (maybe more often than we think) God is wondering why we are still crying out to Him when we should be moving on (Exodus 14 v 15.) Knowing your season and knowing His voice, integral to our walk.
I admired Oprah for shedding light on people who normally wouldn't have gotten any attention. One of my favorite stories involved a woman who lived not far from my family. She was dying of cancer and started videotaping advice for her young daughter, everything from applying make-up to deciding to get married. It was beautiful and I know that her family was comforted by Oprah's support after her passing.
Many researchers have found evidence that such payments can influence doctors’ treatment decisions and contribute to higher costs by encouraging the use of more expensive drugs and medical devices.
OK, I'm not terribly broken up that baseball isn't in the Olympics, but when I see BMX in the Games, I can see why some might not take the Olympics as seriously as before. I will not be watching any BMX Olympic competition. I don't watch the X-Games either.
Leno's tastes are more Presidential: "It would be better with sausage and pepperoni," he quipped, after taking a bite.
In her own words: Dubai’s Desperate Housewife has lived in Dubai for 11 years. She quit her high-flying job to be a full-time mum to a 4-year-old and a small baby – something she wrestles with every day. Although she loves being there for her kids, she lives a parallel life in her head; one where her career continued its upward trajectory and her days are not spent on the school run and dangling rattles for a baby to swat.
I have distress the lovely Magnolia Paper and used Worn Lipstick around the edge, the lush pink papers are Bo Bunny from The Hobby House, and all the roses are from Wild Orchid Crafts, I have also used the most stunning cream lace that I bought from Tab at Tabby Crafts. Hope you like this and have found the tutorial helpful. Enjoy your Sunday we have the most glorious sunny day here, bright and crisp just how I like it
‘I don’t know,’ I answered, troubled.
Ralegh at once followed his unlucky forerunners. Undeterred by the fact that he had now only one other ship to support his own, he made a surprise attack on San Joseph, and took Berreo prisoner; with the characteristically laconic comment, 'Which had I not done, I should have savoured very much of the Ass.'
Sam turned to her father. "Are we really going up there?
GC: I’m just glad to see Antietam go back in it. I read online that originally the movie was going to be Rated R when Maxwell submitted it and then he made some edits to get it down to PG-13. Since it was such a bloody battle, maybe that’s what got the rating down.
Doyle in her first round of tesitmony said she had been opposed to the original plan, and opposes the modified plan, questioning “pie-in-the-sky promises” of jobs and housing, as well as warning of parking lots and an arena delivering private profits to Forest City Ratner.
I wonder how much of the article was Jackson’s own writing and how much he was told to write by the politburo and his editor. Poor man probably had to rewrite the article ten times and in the end had his name attached to it.
All staff will be fully clothed in new uniforms except for the bartenders, who will be topless.
My Grandma Ollie taught me how to sew (she had one of those old pedal driven Singer machines and would save fabric scraps for me to create doll clothes with). She taught me how to make fudge from scratch. When I would spend the night I got to sleep in her HUGE (or so it seemed to me) four poster feather bed that I needed a step stool to climb in with. In her kitchen, she had this jar next to the stove where she would store bacon drippings (and other cooking fats that to this day are still unknown entites). She would then use these grease renderings in her homemade cookies and baked goods - and to this day I cannot duplicate them, but oh the memories! She let nothing go to waste. If a cake went dry, then she would make pudding to put on top of it. If there were leftover hot dog buns, she would make these sinful breakfast treats (she would lather the buns with REAL butter, sprinkle on brown sugar and cinnamon, and then put them under the broiler until the butter melted and made a sort of caramel breakfast bun). Later in years she injured her hip and walked with a cane, and by golly if you were naughty and within reach, you would get a swat with that cane (or at least that's what my brothers said, because I was always such an angel - grin). She was also a master quilt maker and had a large quilting loom where I could sit for hours and watch her nimble fingers fly across those fabrics making such ease and grace making these amazing designs. And every year I could count on birthday packages wrapped in white tissue paper and filled with clothing she had lovingly made just for me, and an angel food cake with pink frosting and sprinkles. She was a woman of few words, but huge gestures and I loved her dearly.
They think vegans/vegetarians don’t have any energy and are tired all the time. In reality, vegetarians and vegans have more energy than most because of eating fresh things instead of meat weighing them down. They make healthier choices. Instead of looking at someone who’s skinny and assuming that they are anorexic or bulimic, let the fact that they have probably worked hard for that body start to enter your mind. Eating healthier causes natural weight loss. It’s normal.
Hi blogging pals :) still no Christmas cards, im soooooo late its unreal .... LOL (",)
Below: in this 1905 Harpers Weekly cartoon, McClellan is seen as a little boy holding the Tammany tiger, devouring the 'fusion candidate' (Seth Low). President Theodore Roosevelt peeks from the side. (He always did like wildlife.) Within three years, McClellan would be the devoured.
We have split up atoms but can’t break down our prejudices.
“Yes, but it could be argued that what you just said counts as an answer.”
Made me feel a bit sorry for all those who work in films and who are credited but we never get to see unless we sit for more than the 5 minutes allotted before the cinema staff come in and chivvy everyone out. 'See Mum, I do have a credit, I do work in the movies.' 'Yes, son, if you say so.'
Senators who cut estate taxes for the super-rich and fund Star Wars and all sorts of other corporate scams only notice the deficit when someone proposes a budget item that might actually do some good. But news stories don’t put two and two together.
I am not sure if I ever gave my baby brother, or his finance (now wife), blog names. I will have to work on that. But, they got married. In Tennessee. It was a beautiful wedding that was distinctly them. Very special. I got to be a part of it by helping coordinate. This was an important event in my life, probably more so than I knew before it happened. I've always loved baby brother in a sort of parental way; very differently than I love the other brother -- an age difference of 11 years and where I was in the world when he was little left a huge mark on me. His marriage will probably only be topped by the marriages of my own children. Knowing, that SHE is his soul mate is huge. I know this from the bottom of my heart, beyond a shadow of a doubt, and even have had an angel visit and tell me so. (Yes, I was visited in a dream. No alcohol or hallucinogens required. I'll tell the story sometime. )
Not only can exercise prevent you from gaining excess weight and ease or prevent back pain and other discomforts, it can help boost your energy level and reduce the risk of gestational diabetes. It can also help prevent pregnancy-related high blood pressure, postpartum depression, increase stamina and muscle strength, which helps you prepare for labor (making it easier to give birth). Plus most women who exercise during pregnancy often have a faster recovery from labor, and their baby will tend to be leaner and calmer.
I like you too much to bore you like that!
2 teaspoons ground ginger
Download available soon.
So, there you have it! I hope you all had a wonderful weekend and I will post something again very soon!
He is a good eater and likes to graze most of the day as well as have his meals.
The overwhelming public reaction not only from Catholics but from countless of other Malaysians and even Muslims is that the AG has failed to uphold the rule of law and that what he had pronounced, proclaimed and preached so piously about was mere pretence!
10. I Love You, Man
These day’s that morning show happens to be the revamped CBS This Morning, but over my “working” life I have gone through each of the major morning shows and I tell you they all fall short in a way.
Now I don't want for a second to compare me saving few bucks on a posh chicken (could I sound anymore wanky middle class? Um, no not really........) with people who are really struggling with putting any meal on the table , especially at this time of year. I was thinking about this on my spin through the aisles , as the Remuera Rotary club had joined forces with the Auckland City Mission to get more food for the foodbank by handing out flyer's as you went into the supermarket. You were encouraged to buy an extra item or two with your shop (they provided examples such as cereal, coffee, tinned food etc), to deposit in their trolley by the doors as your left after checkout.
*Saranne Magennis,** AISHE President.*
This stray kitten was raised by a mother dog and her puppies. The kitten learned how to growl, shake as well as other stuff the puppies did. A little girl named Lizzie fell in love with this kitty. She wanted to give her the "purrfect" name. Lizzie named her new kitty "Puppy"
*from me... if anyone else wants to give me a prize or make important people notice my awesome dioramas so that I can make a living doing silly things like this, that is totally acceptable.
Lindsey
For the past month, I have been haunted by a terrible dream. In the dream, my eldest son Logan has died. When I am dreaming, I understand completely how and why this has happen, but yet, when I wake, I can never remember why or how it has happened - only that, I know I just dreamt he was gone… and even though I am now awake… and even though I don’t know why he died in my dream, the pain from the fear of him being gone has washed over me in the form of night sweats and tears, that soak my pillow.
But the story doesn’t end there. The physicist left a flaw in his proof, and has invited everyone to see if they can figure it out.
4 vast
"To fully know what it is to be human, it is just as important to go through the hard times of old age, loss of social roles, illness and approaching death as it is to go through the pleasant phases of youth. The hard parts can provide insight and wisdom as nothing else can.
Buff: Well ... Take that outfit you're wearing now, or rather, almost wearing now. I mean, you're almost falling out of it.
smudged. no break in their layers.
On Thursday, when Zachary came home from school, his glasses looked like they had been sat on, sat on, something... Pretty bent out of shape! I was pretty pleased I had waited a day to go in for the adjustment.
Not every social network makes sense for your business, and you won't necessarily like using every one. If you try to do too much you'll just end up dropping them or posting erratically and it won't do you any good. I, for one, don't enjoy Facebook. I still have a Facebook page just because it is so popular, and some people use it to contact me - so I can respond to them, but I don't really use it to post anything. And that's fine with me. You have to find what works best for you so that it's not so forced and unnatural. When I used to try and use my facebook page I always just ended up spamming links. I couldn't keep up with posting photos and everything else Facebook has to offer. It just didn't work. So I dropped it. Don't be afraid to drop a network if it doesn't work out.
The first question, though not so black and white, is easier to answer. I returned to New York for love. The love of my family, the love of my friends, and my love for the city all drew me home.
Fast Cars
My sister, who is 8 years younger than I, has always maintained the role as “the good child” to both my mother and father. Loyalty to siblings has never been a part of her personality, despite her survival from the cruelty of both of our parents. However, she just was never able to break away from our parents dysfunctional ties. She has always “tattled” and rushed to “tell” before either my brother or I could intervene on any given situation. I specifically asked her NOT to tell mom that I’d done the DNA test and to “let me handle it”. I was just getting ready to call mom and to ask questions and confront her again, when the phone rang……..
Hubby has a habit of keeping the boxes of anything electrical we buy in there .. .. just in case we need to return something .. .. .. but some of the boxes up there are for equipment that we parted with years ago!!!! I feel certain we could have made a child's wardrobe out of one of the boxes it was so big.
The impenetrable mystique of the land itself is a fitting backdrop to the mysterious events of the novel. The Egyptian landscape is a haunting presence in the novel – exotic, foreign, and inscrutable. Amelia speaks for the reader when she says she would “never be free of its enchantment, never cease to desire it after it was gone” (192).
I am so morally conflicted.... Here we have a criminal who seems to understand the concept of justice, who seems to feel remorse for his crimes, who may even have partially reformed himself in prison, yet he still supports the Raiders.
She looked very natural on camera and did a great job presenting the jewelry line, which is called “Gemstine Elegance, Mine Style.” Jay King’s name was not mentioned. But Stacie, you are a star, a natural.
In case you were still wondering if this was somehow personal, the use of Obreht’s first name gives the game away. This is the world we live in, and in itself is not incriminating. What is incriminating is the hypocrisy. Fowler argues that the central problem of the MFA is its role as artistic monastery: isolated, solipsistic, and self-satisfied. The answer is “the real world” and living long enough in the real world to have something to say. What Fowler doesn’t mention is published a memoir at the ripe age of…29.
“Maybe I should take you to a doctor…” Maybe? I don’t think that there’s any need for that… There a psychotic nurse right across the hall, perhaps she cou… Yeah, a doctor’s better… Probably Dr. Dresdin, who lives in 10-G. Or, if you’re really in a hurry, Dr. Who!
Another pair of stunningly shaped legs, Pia Toscano, American singer, flaunting her well shaped calves by wearing a short dress and heels. In my opinion her legs are her best assets, although there is nothing wrong with her looks as such. Fact remains, she just naturally puts the emphasis on the part of her body that really make you look twice.
rising and sinking in a rhythm without time.
Fortunatus nodded and signaled Ronan to follow him out of the room.
And the glories of your dreams,
Stuff it, thought Gerald, a god must make his mark.
The last step was to go around the 'frame' with white gesso and cover up the mess. Intelligent crafters usually lay down a mask to protect the white surface, but I wanted to be free to step out as it were, so I didn't this time. I left a little color underneath the bow of the ship for shadow.
TNA Reaction showcasing The Motor City Machineguns winning the Best of 5 series last week. That was such an awesome moment, and it certainly put both teams over as 2 of the best teams in the world. I myself wouldn’t mind seeing Motor City Machineguns defending their tag straps against The World’s Greatest Tag Team. What are you waiting for TNA, sign Benjamin and Haas.
‘Police cars were flying up the runway. There were four fire engines, paramedics, a helicopter.’
Simmer for about 20 minutes and add two tablespoons of chopped cilantro. Continue to simmer for another 10 minutes or so. Garnish with any (or all!) of the following.
Jintan: What’s matter with you?
Easter Sunday, and the phone calls began. Sticks told Fingers that the gig was at the Barry McGuiggan’s Arms in Penge on the evening of the following Tuesday. He told Howesey that it was at The Frog and Lilliputian in Penge on Wednesday. He told Bassman that it would be at Uncle Tom’s Cobblian Hall on the Thursday. He printed 500 flyers, 150 posters and paid for advertising on Penge FM, and he told them that the gig was on the Friday in The Flying Trousers in Penge. He was, apparently, a little confused under all the pressure and had consumed a large amount of easter egg and gin.
Truly be accountable and transparent.
Here's the low-down:
Whoa...I want to try this stunt leh!!!
we got big giant ballons, cute decor from around the house, and the happiest two year old on the planet. Our bubbaboo LOVES some powdered donuts. They are his favorite. In fact, i'm pretty sure i'm still finding powdery goodness in between our couches...
Charlie Rich The most beautiful girl US
What do you think? Doesn't this scripture give us the best promise and good news ever?
‘The alarm rings and we groan that it’s time to get up. Be thankful. We can hear; some are deaf. We shut our eyes to the morning light. Be thankful; some are blind. It’s an effort to get up; we feel stiff and tired. Be thankful; some are bed-ridden. Our jobs may be boring and our efforts unappreciated. Be thankful; some are unemployed.’ (my paraphrase)
And snakes may famish and fry
Welcome to the 26th Knick of Time Tuesday party.
Holy shit! It can’t be. It bloody hell just can NOT be!!
If you would like to know more about b2b sailing days and the benefits they can offer your business, please don't hesitate to contact Michael Cole on mhscole@btinternet.com
As I say, I always wanted to grow up to be one of those men who has such things, and it seems it has crept up on me.
on the side of the Soft Suede Card Stock,
Each day is always a big holiday
These monsters do not work alone… they have accomplices.
Vegetarians please don’t despair. We’ll be writing plenty of blogs that will appeal to your fancies. For you carnivores, though, please keep reading. We’re talking steak this week. For me, it’s a primal thing. Pure beef. Unadulterated. Thrown on the grill and done up medium rare. Is there anything more satisfying? I think not.
Mondo Cane (1962) is famous for being what is considered the first shock-umentary. Shockumentaries take controversial, perverse, sensational, disturbing, and yes, shocking, documentary subjects and show you, the viewer, just what kind of strange sickness exists in this world. Often times they stage much of the main action and embellish the facts to make things more than what they really are. Mondo Cane was the first and would influence a whole new genre, the most famous offspring being Faces of Death (1980) and its sequels. Cane, the product of filmmakers Paolo Cavara, Gualtiero Jacopetti, and Franco Prosperi, is a warped, ironic, and actually quite humorous look into strange and disturbing customs all around the world. Where the film obtains its charm is not from its unflinching gluttony for the subject matter, but the humor it finds in juxtaposing the most bizarre and grotesque exotic rituals with more familiar “civilized” acts that mirror them. This film loves irony. Almost the whole movie could be described by a narrator saying, “You think that’s gross? Well, take a look at what you do.” The narrator is probably the best part of the movie too. He almost sounds like the guiding voice through a classic Disneyland ride like The Haunted Mansion.
As for the interface, it’s TouchWiz on top of Android 4.0 again, and there’s new gesture functions to help you get around.
I was going back and forth about whether or not I would post this entry. I was SO ashamed at my epic fail and didn't want to admit to my defeat, let alone publicly announce it to the world! Plus, I felt like I had an image to live up to...you know? Everything on my site is always pretty, well put-together, and well thought-out. How could I possibly try to pass this mess off as good blogging material? lol.
Grief-stricken and determined to grant Finn's last request, she rushes to leave immediately. But she only gets as far as the driveway before running into Rusty, Finn's best friend since third grade and his polar opposite. She hasn't seen him in ages, thanks to a falling out between the two guys, but Rusty is much the same as Honor remembers him: arrogant, stubborn. . . and ruggedly good looking. Neither one is what the other would ever look for in a road trip partner, but the two of them set off together, on a voyage that makes sense only because it doesn’t.
SOE is in discussions with Sigil regarding the future of Vanguard and Sigil Games in Carlsbad. Talks are going well and first and foremost, our primary concern right now is what’s best for Vanguard and its community. We want to ensure that this game and its community have a healthy future. The specifics that we work out over the coming days will all be with that single goal in mind.
“I disagree, partly with the argument made by Bruce (Robinson) that if the B of E did not bail out NR then it would be the depositors, not the shareholders and Management that suffered. In fact, today after the Chancellor has said the Government will use taxpayers money to bail out the Bank, its shares, and the shares of the other banks likely to be next in line at the begging bowl - Alliance and Leicester and Bradford and Bingley - have soared. Clearly, the main beneficiaries have indeed been those shareholdres and the Management that undoubtedly also has many shares and share options. The whole basis of capitalist ideology is that owners of Capital make profits for taking risks, but if capitalists can make huge profits and Capital gains by making risky decisions such as those made by NR and the other banks, yet are guaranteed against going bust by the Government where is the risk. In fact that is the whole basis on which neo-Liberalism operates at a macro as opposed to micro economic level, and where it differs with classic Liberalism.
i want to see my head to explode
It’s like an ocean
Like Batman Begins (2005), Iron Man told the story of a super hero’s origins, and like the earlier film–which was itself a prequel to three previous modern Batman films–its ending segued easily into a sequel, planned for April 2010.
Jester King Farmhouse Black Metal
That's it from me today, but I've still got a lot more to share! So, I hope you'll join me for the remainder of the countdown!
Tonya Finley – Indy 84 (13.55%)
Decked out in a black cowboy hat, lavender shirts, silver-tipped boots and championship buckles, he burned up the highways racing from one rodeo town to another.
I eliminate views that are negative and unkind.
Take up our quarrel with the foe:
No, my agent dealt with that! I wrote the novel on the Writing for Young People MA at Bath Spa University. When I’d finished, I sent it to agent Rosemary Canter, and was lucky enough to be taken on by her. So I didn’t have to do the sending out to publishers and getting rejections. It only took her two months to place it.
Like in most classic haunted house films, the imposing house in this film is also a character in its own right. Throughout the screenplay various conversations and dialogue between characters work to personify the house – Eleanor (Julie Harris) whispers lines such as “It’s staring at me” and “It’s waiting for me”, while the opening narration explains that the house was “born bad.” It also has a rich history which adds to its formidable reputation – madness, suicide and mysterious deaths have plagued its inhabitants. Odd camera angles suggest something is always present and watching the guests, particularly Eleanor, and the use of creepy sound effects elicits moody suspense. The interior of the house is incredibly atmospheric; long dark hallways and giant rooms seem to swallow up the people who wander through them. That Wise decided to film The Haunting in black and white during a time when colour was very much in vogue, really adds to its striking look.
by Marrecca Fiori
My favorite method of dry hopping so far is to put the hops in muslin bags with weights (sanitized marbles, stainless, or glass) and sink them down into the beer. I tie sanitized fishing like to the muslin bag to suspend the bag and retreive it later. This method provided awesome hop aroma to the SMaSH Willammette/Maris Otter Pale Ale I brewed recently.
Using a color picture as a reference, she has to.....whew, well she has to start creating the portrait with thread. Deciding what color combinations and what stitches will be used certainly seems like a huge undertaking to me. Not to worry though, Peri is up to the task.
The next day, Michal and Haley had to walk an extra fifteen minutes to reach the second nearest LetsGo store. Michal thought it best to wait a few days before he made another appearance at the LetsGo on Holy Corner. But they had scarcely collected their basket when the store manager approached them.
Women are too valuable to be disrespected
When, cause of the poor lighting, it's not possible to change the shutter time or the aperture over a certain limit it comes to assist us the adjustment of the ISO sensitivity.
(this is not usually asked outright but regularly implied)
Well…maybe, right? I was certain that I knew what I had seen. My middle sister Beth was terrified of her own shadow back then, so I dared not tell her what I had seen. And I didn’t. I let it go, and didn’t tell anyone else about it.
So, instead, Mum and i and the boys watched Tim and Dad disappear over the top of the rock and then we went for a bit of a walk around part of the base. Lots to see and walking around even a small section made you realise how huge Uluru is.
According to Hendrix, that is the person you should marry. There are several theories on romantic love, of course: “exchange” (I can’t punch any higher above my weight, so I’m done), “bio-logic” (your hip-to-waist ratio is tops), and “persona” (you will impress my impressionable friends). Yet, these theories don’t account for break-up grief. Or the fact that despite meeting thousands of people in a lifetime – including hundreds of fecund, symmetrical, socially acceptable suitors – we’re only deeply drawn to a few.
At least we know now and can move forward trusting that our paperwork will be accepted.
Gorgeous, huh? What strikes your fancy? I knew you would love it...I am torn between the cuff, the darling evening bag and the beautiful white necklace, I could see that with a beautiful sun dress on tanned glistening skin.....perfection! That's it.....wishing you a splendid day, thank you again Marsha for your generosity!
Whether you're broke or evergreen
I have been there from the beginning, hoping, and wishing, and crying and laughing, and hugging and loving (I'm the one with the weird laugh.) And now that you're here in the big wide world, Auntie VEG wants to make sure you know just how loved you are. And to write down all the promises I made with the universe, should you decide to make your Mommy and Daddy all your very own.
Well, here is to a continued wonderful spring with wonderful weather! And a happy April!
Participation is free of charge and there is no age limit or any other restriction. Your work can be submitted online.
I abandoned transitioning less than two weeks later. It was a matter of self-preservation....
ABV: 9.37%
It was a beautiful spring day in New Zealand, and I was visiting Pureora Forest, a national park a bit south of Auckland. I had been in New Zealand a couple of weeks at the time, and had managed to see a fair selection of New Zealand birds. I had met a ranger who directed me to a very big observation tower in the forest, and told me I would have a good chance of seeing some good stuff, but just how good he probably hadn’t imagined. The observation tower was quite a magnificent structure and tall enough for people to be able to see over the top of most of the trees.
What will happen if the target isn't met within the specified time?
digi; Bo Bunny papers; Recollections cardstock; Copics (E0000, E000, E00, E29, R20, BG000); Gelly Roll white pen; Studio G sentiment; CraftSmart Teal, Chocolate, and Gold inks; recycled flower; Making Memories brad; Martha Stewart Mica tinsel glitter and Crystal glitter; Recollections pearls. Tools: sewing machine.
in honor of madisoncary’s first birthday, i will be giving away:
1. On Monday, the Turkey Point nuclear power plant notified the NRC that a non-licensed contract supervisor tested positive for illegal drugs in a random Fitness for Duty screening last Friday. The employee’s access to the plant has been terminated.
Those who have enjoyed the 1970s American television sitcom Welcome Back Kotter remember the character Arnold Horshack whose trademark line was ‘I’m so confused!’
The easiest way to find something lost around the house is to buy a replacement. ~Author Unknown
But if you like a good thriller, I recommend "The Girl With The Dragon Tattoo," -- conditionally. It's quite dark. You must promise me that if you are frightened or grossed out that you will not call me at 3 a.m. because you can't sleep. It's not that I won't be awake. I probably will be. I simply don't care to chat at that hour of the morning unless it's with one particular person or with my dogs.
The others are clearly less good on the paper but you can still catch 1-2 excellent show every year in Ancona, Bari, Trieste... The victims of erosion of Italian opera seem to be Teatro Carlo Felice and Teatro San Carlo who year after year were thinning down their programs and now they struggle to exist. We of course wish them a huge "In bocca al lupo".
Storms rise
Amazing to think it is now 17 years since my last effort!
Why Japanese Parallel Societies Don’t Bother Anyone
After thinking about it for a bit I think it might stem from my desire to be in a relationship. All the guys I've dated since he and I went our separate ways have been sort of a let down and/or nothing ever came of it. Not their fault of course.
15:15: Michael McFadden begins by stating that anti-smoking organisations spent $800m last year on advertising to scare and denormalise. Thy even bought air time during the most expensive TV show for advertising, the Superbowl.
Situation 2
Kimberly can be hired to work with existing bands.
The manual outlines policies for processing detainees into internment camps both globally and inside the United States. International agencies like the UN and the Red Cross are named as partners in addition to domestic federal agencies including the Department of Homeland Security and FEMA.
I took a few pictures not nearly enough, the show was a very large show with wonderful quilts and lots of venders. The venders were really a lot of fun to see and feel all the goodies!!
* 1- 8oz. package cream cheese (I used reduced fat)
just tells me that it thinks of me
This repulsive concept was changed with the popularization of Bram Stoker’s famous 1897 novel about a fictionalized vampire Count Dracula, who was presented as an aristocrat Transylvanian nobleman. He was imbued with supernatural powers, superhuman capabilities and a lustful passion for beautiful ladies whose blood he became addicted to. His blood sucking was two-fold -- to maintain his (eternal) “life force” and eventually befall his victim with the curse of vampirism and ultimate death. No matter how resplendent the “vampire” is portrayed in mythology and fiction, in Scripture blood drinking and creatures of darkness are judged as despicable by God. Also, Scripture explains fallen spirits ("angels") as those who deliberately chose to follow their leader Satan (Isa. 14) and deny their Creator God. For this choice, they are damned with eternal separation from God and an eternity in the Lake of Fire (Rev 15).
And as I stood there in my lovely friends' washroom, all halloweened up, I did the only thing a really comfortable friend would do, I took off the girdle and let my rather large patooty explode!!! And as my body parts then settled back into their regular roles, I proceeded to jump around like a maniac trying to wave the rather nauseous scent away, then I rejoined the group, prayed nobody needed the bathroom soon, drank some wine and relaxed.
Next was Zack Ryder against Michael McGillicutty. I’ve loved Mcgillicutty as late, but this was Zack Ryder with Scott Stanford commentating it. Yeah, I had to be a Ryder mark. Boy was the crowd into these two matches. This crowd was very trained to yell for the faces, though. The only real controversy in the crowd was with Daniel Bryan later on (and whenever we were screaming, but let’s face it, we were drowned out a lot).
Obama ignored requests for his records from Occidental College, where he studied for two years before transferring to Columbia University.
3/4 cup milk
January 2011
“Well, as long as your safe, we can get through this together” Daniel said and reached for me, taking me into his warm embrace that always gave me a feeling of safety. There was nothing I could do now, but accept what is and be grateful that it wasn’t anyone close I suppose.
Thursday I had therapy. I went through some of the same things that I’ve gone through before but how I responded was much different. I usually subconsciously suppress anger and love especially. I suppress every emotion to some degree but particularly those.
When the game ended we walked over to thank the coaches and give them gifts. I noticed Karoline walking toward me with tears in her eyes. She came to me and buried her head in my shoulder. She was defeated and broken and just wanted to be consoled. I assured her she had done her best. They were just a better team. The heartbreaking part is that she had practiced every day during the week so she would be ready for this game. Each day we both went outside where I kicked ball after ball at her in preparation for Saturday. We spent hours practicing and yet it wasn’t enough. I know she went in that goal as ready as she could be but still she failed.
While three white men in Texas drag a black man behind their truck
82. Drinking Problem -- Rehab
"He said just throw strikes early and then go after them," Cole told The Times. "That's all I did. I felt pretty good. I got excited a few times but for the most part I was relaxed."
He presented the device now, laid out snugly in the palm of his hand. It was brass, dull and looked like four even circles melded together.
From satin cases poured in rich profusion;
Cesar Cedeno - .318 with 16 homers and 43 RBI's
And in autumn, it falls down."
I live in a nice apartment complex and one of the maintenance guys here has really gone out of his way to be helpful with me and to do things for me that would be considered going out of his way and out of normal things the maintenance man would do for tenants. If I buy things that need assembly (yes Neecy is” assembly required” disabled) – he puts it together for me. If I need additional things done around my apartment that I would have difficulty doing or that I cannot do myself and would have to call my father or a man to do, he does it. I never asked him to do these things, he just offered one day out of seeing me carrying some items to my apartment. Before he actually started doing things for me, he ALWAYS went out of his way to let me know how nice I looked and always asked if I needed help around my apartment he’d be happy to do it for me.
One of the things I want in there is a bust of Sir Isaac Newton, which I picked up in England in May. It's a 35 mm tall, solid, heavy white metal piece, sold unfinished, by Phoenix Miniatures:
Now, I know many folks are very choosy about accompaniments for their apple crisp. Some insist on whipped cream, others like ice cream, and others like caramel sauce and ice cream. I say, to each her own. I don't care for caramel sauce on mine because I like the apple flavor to be the highlight, but I do love a scoop of either vanilla bean or coffee ice cream served alongside the warm crisp. Another fantastic accompaniment, especially if you love combining savory with sweet, is some very sharp cheddar cheese. When I was a girl, my dad would often slide a slice of cheddar under the "lid" of a slice of apple pie. I thought it was a strange thing to do until the first time I tried it, and then I understood. Oh, boy, did I. The same principle applies with apple crisp.
Our prices are very competitive and this & makes us an ideal place to buy your card making supplies online. December new products include Petaloo flower layers, Ranger Glitter Glue and Martha Stewart Punches.
So, if one of your New Year's reolutions is to get ahead for this Christmas, don't pack away your Christmas craft stash...join in our fortnightly challenges, and we'll help take the stress out of Christmas crafting! Our first challenge this year will begin on January 11th...but before we kick off another tour through the alphabet, there's still time to join in with our last challenge of 2011...Z is for Zingy Colours...which runs until 6pm on January 10th.
Student : From … GOD …
Grated coconut-1/2 cup
What would Joyce at the Ambulance say if she knew Lindy was growing drugs? Joyce would kick me out, school would kick me out too. Then where would I go all day?
Silently sulking next to the carousel trying in vain to talk myself out of the attitude problem, bits of conversations around me floated through my ears and into my brain where they were not translated, but understood.
Kid makes great play of the fact there's two clips from the venerable Soul Train on the show this week, maybe something he shouldn't have promoted too much given it shows up the paucity of new songs in the studio, and for that matter the classy simplicity of the Soul Train studio, a bare wall, a lit performer, an ostentatiously branded glitterball and an audience who seem into it. Plus not even Billy Ocean would think of pulling off a light blue dress liberally equipped with sequins and matching skull cap. As for an in-house dance troupe, theirs are pushed off to the sides and unselfconscious, one couple hand in hand, certainly nothing planned out. And it's the original recording being used as backing. No wonder Johnny Pearson's boys were often made out to be a culture shock to Pops visitors.
Those are four simple questions that are going to have some complex analysis applied to them. I’m not going way into the weeds with this one but my goal here is to get you to think in an analytical manner when looking at your threat.
Saturday morning I got up and finished the King Cake I baked for Brandon's birthday. The cake itself looks strange because I put too much food coloring in the sugar and it clumped up, but it tasted really good, I swear! I'll do a post on the king cake later this week so you can do what I recommend, not what I did, should anyone out there choose to make their own cake for Mardi Gras.
Restrain yourself from moving your legs too much when you swing. You do not need to rely on legs to get the torque needed for a strong shot; understand that the legs help you shift your power but the torque comes primarily from your wrists.
I arbitrarily chose the fourth of July as the date of the first quake. I originally thought of setting it on the religious holiday Easter but that seemed too early in the year. I chose 9-11-2012 as the date of the third and fourth quakes because it was about 9 weeks after the first. And I thought that both the fourth of July and 9-11 have deteriorated into American state religious holidays. The New Madrid fault line historically does seem to like American religious holidays.
Loudly yours.
Just wanted to let you all know what's happening around here.
The Harlem Ambassadors offer a unique brand of Harlem-style basketball, featuring high-flying slam dunks, dazzling ball-handling tricks and hilarious comedy routines.
This prompted a moment of frantic graph scribbling (re-igniting my catastrophic inability at GCSE level Physics), to help explain the point, but in order to save embarrassment they will remain in my notepad, and regardless they were not particularly helpful.
know I’d once more lit the bulb and gone too far.
She tried to move her foot away, but the jelly fish grabbed on to it, with its tentacles. "It's not time for you to go yet," it said.
By a whisper.
I'm really excited about my current WIP (work in progress) and thought I would share - a baby quilt (pattern HERE) for our baby due in a few months.
Of all the projects on the shelf why did I choose this one, now? Why did I fling it onto the shelf all those years ago? I don’t know. If it feels right at the time then how can I argue? I want him, want that story in my life right now and that’s enough…and I can feel the second section pulling at me to finish with him and get to them – there’s a lot of fun to be had in that part of the story. I’m heading for the laughter, but must write the madness first.
At last, the door shuts behind me, enclosing me in the cocoon of safety built by the familiar feels, and smells, and noises. The tic-tock of the grandfather clock, the clanging of a water pipe from the heating system, the sweet, humid smell of earth and plants. The absence of opera sounds.
"Those clouds look ominous, maybe we should go back?" one of us suggested but the other waved the idea away. We'd already been caught in the rain once today and scurried under one of the bridges crossing the Seine where we stumbled on an impromptu street magician show. It turned into a entertaining foray -- damp Parisians and tourists huddled around a man with fewer teeth than buttons on his morning coat as he spent time queuing up C+C Music Factory on his iPod.
I was introduced to the costume department, all glorious, who then proceeded to strip me down to my underwear and spend two hours having clothes thrown over me like a student bedroom floor. Now, if you've never been dressed by anyone, it is a strangely intimate yet sexless moment, hands smoothing here and lifting there, followed by a stepped back appraisal before removing an item of clothing and handing you another. And yet after an hour of this, you seem to forget that this is going on about you, like you've left your body. I remember reading an interview with Alice Krige, who played Star Trek's Borg Queen, saying that in between takes at least five people came over and started touching up her make-up, fixing the suit and whatnot, and you just rise above it. I didn't believe her, but it's true. You do forget that people are pawing over you, all these hands everywhere. Although I was more moved by the following quote that said she wasn't able to be taken out of the suit to go to the bathroom whilst filming. She initially dehydrated herself, but this didn't work out - so the costume team cut a slit in the base of costume's foot for her to use as an 'outlet'. Yes, a multi-million dollar movie, and here's one of the stars having to piss herself while standing over a drain.
I sit back and imagine he is likely to be listening to Right Said Fred. Something about a catwalk, and doing a routine on it.
So, there are some great ways to get in shape for the summer. The key is consistent use of exercise and good meals with green tea in them. Have a great summer y'all!
As far as I know the last time this work was printed was in the late 1800s, edited by Fr. John Morris, S.J. in his book, The Devotions of the Lady Lucy Herbert of Powis. The edition that I’m reproducing here was printed in 1791. The book can be viewed on line at Google Books.
I'm going to San Diego next Tuesday, YAY!! and I plan to have a great time while I'm there, but getting there scares the bejezzus out of me. I'm not a great flyer and I will be flying on an airline I'm not familiar with in airports I've never been with That Other Kid! Coming home next Friday adds to my stress a bit since I will be flying home with My Marine and That Other Kid and I'm not 100% sure we will all be on the same flight. The problem? I'm concerned That Other Kid is going to throw a full out tantrum (yes, he still throws tantrums even though he is almost 8!) in the airport if we don't get to fly with his brother! Then I get to deal with a tantrum throwing almost 8 year old in an airport where I can't discipline him the way I normally would.
Alooooha! No need for concern. I know occasionally people think I die when I don't blog for, oh, months and months, but I recently realized something...I think the more cool stuff I have going on, the less I blog. Truly. So, instead of wondering if I'm okay when I don't blog, you should be alarmed if I start blogging five times a week or something. Deal? I'm slammed in all the best ways! In many ways, I think it's still March, because things have been in mega-high gear around here since then. A little whirlwind is pretty healthy...
On the upside, got an "A" on my last illustration (for reasons completely unknown to me...), which is pretty cool for me because last year the same teacher gave me a B as my highest grade. It just feels like a pretty measurable amount of success to me, so I'm basking while I can. :D
So, I’ve contacted each one, and told them to be truthful with me, and let me know if they just want to be friendly at work and ignore each other outside of work, which is kind of how it is now. Once I called them out, they refuse to answer, so I take the silence as my answer.
1048 **D-V/22/1989. “The Allan Bloom Book and Education Today.” Faculty Retreat, Lenoir-Rhyne College, Lutheridge Camp, Arden, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(11), above, pp. 156-63.) See Item C-1998(1), above, Item D-X/27/1991, below.
We hope you'll join us in our final Sketch challenge for 2011.
We met with the kid, OK? Please get off our backs and let us get out of this PR mess as gracefully as possible.
Randy Kay is standing on a paved parking lot. But he sees a natural sanctuary.
So then I decided to try a selection from a paper that my son, a college sophomore, wrote for his philosophy class. He received an A on this paper, and his professor strongly encouraged him to submit it to a philosophy journal. I plugged in about 500 words, and Grammarly.com gave it a 63%!
I don’t know how we knew, but we aptly named our dogs. Did they change their behavior due to how we treated them? Did the dogs telegraph their personalities to us and hence named them correctly? Nature versus nurture; a long discussion for another time perhaps. The Empress, cause she’s better than a princess. Mind you, she’s no lady, not the way she devours cat poop, sniffs every dog butt that walks near, licks drool from the largest fanged mouth I’ve ever seen. And these are just a few of her endearing antics.
One of the question-ees had not seen the individual, but a few weeks later she approached the desk and explained that the person they had been seeking was sitting at a computer a few yards away. The librarian was able to confirm the person's name and give him that bad news that he owed money for books.
if you are having trouble with the link, PLEASE EMAIL ME: thevintagelemon@hotmail.com
Do they then seek the judgment of (the Days of) Ignorance. And who is better in judgement than Allah for a people who have firm Faith? (V.5:50).
This is the third year for The Summer Show Project. We invite you to submit your work to participate in this unique opportunity and share the experience of exposure, guidance, feedback, community, recognition and support. We invite artists from all disciplines to apply who work in photography and works on paper.
4.) Post our give-away on your facebook page and leave a comment.
Imagine one character finding solace in the songs of mockingbirds on a flower-covered (and floral-scented) mountaintop, while his friend hunkers under a freeway overpass and loses himself in the sounds of the traffic, the vibrations of the ground, and the fumes of a world too busy to notice him.
He recently started following me and being that I have such a low follow number (20 as of today... a new milestone!) I checked him out and saw that he started a neat collection about Japanese players in order to get in touch with his roots. I really dug that and am big in to history and looking for all those small connections that help make us all become who we are. The fabric of life so to speak. Anywho, I had a few cards that I thought he might appreciate more then what I currently did and offered them up in a trade based off of a card I saw on his trade bait page that intrigued me.
NOTE: From stars (vs. 4) to sighs (vs. 6)
I noticed the banner and asked when his birthday was, thinking I'd missed it by a day or so because the banner was still up. "Back in November." I guess if I live that long and anyone prints me a banner, I'll leave it up and slap a new number over the old one every year, too.
Not that I want to put a downer on it. I know how excited you might be with your shiny new CV. You’d be amazed if the top companies in your industry don’t offer you a fantastic job without even needing to interview you. After all, you’ve just uploaded it onto the job boards and the interest from recruiters has been really encouraging so far.
Placebo
Microwave on medium power for another two minutes. Remove and whisk again
‘Adlig Schwenkitten’ is the story I struggled with the most. Unlike the others, this is a story in twenty-four sections covering a twenty-four hour period but it was the sheer number of characters that lost me: Toplev, Boyev, Podkliuchnikov, Lepetushin, Gubaydulin, Gusev, Ostanin, Ishchukov, Larin, Yursh, Veresovoy, Vyzhlevsky, Tarasov, Kasyanov, Boronets, Myagkov, Kandalintsev, Baluev, Nikolaev and that’s not including the first names, ranks and patronymics that just added to the confusion. Too many people. After a while they all blurred into one.
was never spent. The issue died a
The word “non-consensual” says it all, really. It speaks to the inherent violation, conjuring up images of non-consensual sex; i.e. rape.
“More than my mom could,” I said. “When I was a kid, we were very poor.”
I added a lot of fun bells & whistles (so to speak) and wanted to share them with you! Some of my new favorite features:
Yes, we need employees who have the skills to “get the job done” but we also deserve employees who:
I was then asked, "why didn't you?" and there's two elements to that. My first is that a few years ago, I remember reading about a young chap who topped himself, leaving behind a wife and two kids. No doubt the gent in question was suffering greatly, enough to drive him to such an act. As I sat in the car some twelve months ago with the wind and rain beating against the window, the memory of that article came back to me. Family. I would not let this... illness?... take me away from them. Yes, it's my life, but to put them through that, it was the proverbial slap in the face I needed to get myself together.
When the cares of my heart are many, (which they have been)
The very next day, I decided to sign up for the Chicago Marathon 10-10-10, even though I was in no shape to do so! I wanted to do something to honor her, so I signed up for the American Cancer Society fundraising team and committed to raising $1000 in her memory. She was diagnosed with lung cancer in February 2010 and died only two months later… very suddenly and a shocker to us, because she was so healthy. In fact, she was a working crossing guard for the Chicago Police Department all the way up to when she got sick. She actually never smoked a day in her life… we concluded that her illness was caused by over 40 years of breathing in vehicle pollutants while crossing the corners.
Grace Divine, daughter of the local pastor, always knew something terrible happened the night Daniel Kalbi disappeared--the night she found her brother Jude collapsed on the porch, covered in his own blood--but she has no idea what a truly monstrous secret that night held.
Meanwhile, Stannis has to deal with the notion that Melisandre may not be the ally he believes her to be, Bran is still suffering from disturbing dreams, Jon Snow finally reaches the Wall and Theon Greyjoy must prove to his men that he is a worthy Captain.
UPDATE: After reading through the one of our recipe hosts’ posts, I realized I only used half of the butter called for in the recipe. That would certainly explain why the dough stayed crumbly. However, I can attest that the dessert was still quite tasty. Maybe it even qualifies as “Low Fat” — ha.
1. Type the start bold tag, then italicized start tag.
I would be remiss if I did not also mention how horrifyingly unvaried the choice of models are for these pictures. We all know the fashion industry is notorious for reinforcing a specific standard of beauty, but the lack of lower body representation is especially evident in these screen shots. This further reinforces the idea that only individuals that are facsimiles of these models can wear and look good in these clothes. I don’t know that I see many retailers providing lower body diversity while presenting their products online, which just shines a light into another corner of the ways in which the thin ideal is unknowingly reinforced.
In case you didn't catch it... I blogged yesterday (here) to let people know that it's just been finalised - I am moving to New Zealand for the next 5-6 months and I leave here in about 1 month. So I'm putting tonnes on sale to lessen the load of my carry-on (it's a 28 hour flight after all!)
LA: Plug you say? Well, everybody keep an eye out for Jon Sprunk's Shadow's Son, first in a fantasy trilogy about an assassin with the power to melt into the shadows who has an invisible girlfriend. Also forthcoming is Matthew Sturges's (of DC/Vertigo fame) next work, The Office of Shadow, which might best be described as Sandbaggers in the world of the Fae. For more, see: http://www.louanders.com/, http://www.pyrsf.com/, or Twitter @Pyr_Books. On Facebook as "Lou Anders" and also at here.
If that seems vague...it is. Here's another definition: low-alcohol, but not low-taste. It's subjective. Live with it, and enjoy it. We're here to help make your night out more fun, more tasty, and more safe. Cheers!
They talked about rights and nature and peace and the people’s reign:
Solar System debris rains down on Earth in vast quantities — more than a hundred tons of it a day. Most of it vaporizes in our atmosphere, leaving stunning trails of light we call shooting stars. More hazardous are the billions, likely trillions, of leftover rocks — comets and asteroids — that wander interplanetary space in search of targets.
Daisy didn't give us any rules for this one, in fact, the only criteria was for each E-Team member to create a cover that makes her want to fill her journal with artiness. Because I'm smitten with Dyan Reavley's images and colors these days, I "Dylusioned" the living daylights out of a Maya Road chipboard binder...
An interesting case in point is a story that ran in The Wall Street Journal last week about the relationship between online buzz and real-world viewership of TV shows.
What a prince. Maybe I named my pup the wrong name entirely?! I sat with little dude and he rolls over on his back and waits for attention. The pup pleads with his pup eyes. I have a mellow pup.
Because I never want to forget, even for a single day, how luck I am to have found my soulmate.
I cannot believe Christmas is in SIX days. I say this every few weeks, but WHERE has the year gone? The older I get, the faster the time flies. When I was little I remember waiting, what seemed like an eternity, for holidays and birthdays to hurry up and get here. Now? I just want it to all slow down...
